Alaska, session 34, SB213.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 07 (SECTION 1 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON PAGE 2) 01 * Section 1. The following appropriation items are for operating expenditures from the 02 general fund or other funds as set out in the fiscal year 2027 budget summary for the 03 operating budget by funding source to the agencies named for the purposes expressed for the 04 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, unless otherwise indicated. 05 Appropriation General Other 06 Allocations Items Funds Funds 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 * * * * * Department of Administration * * * * * 09 * * * * * * * * * * 10 Centralized Administrative Services 128,101,700 22,627,600 105,474,100 11 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 12 balance on June 30, 2026, of inter-agency receipts collected in the Department of 13 Administration's federally approved cost allocation plans. 14 Office of Procurement and 5,063,200 15 Property Management 16 Office of Administrative 3,696,100 17 Hearings 18 The amount allocated for the Office of Administrative Hearings includes the unexpended and 19 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of program receipts from reimbursable hearing 20 services, mediation fees, and other fees. 21 Facilities Rent Non-State 1,131,800 22 Owned 23 Office of the Commissioner 1,472,100 24 Administrative Services 3,219,400 25 Print Services 2,446,900 26 Finance 37,083,200 27 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 28 balance on June 30, 2026, of inter-agency receipts and general fund program receipts 29 collected in the Department of Administration's federally approved cost allocation plans, 30 which includes receipts collected in connection with its debt collection activities and from 31 credit card rebates. 01 Personnel 14,025,600 02 The amount allocated for the Division of Personnel for the Americans with Disabilities Act 03 includes the unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of inter-agency receipts 04 collected for cost allocation of the Americans with Disabilities Act. 05 Retirement and Benefits 24,247,000 06 Of the amount appropriated in this allocation, up to $500,000 of budget authority may be 07 transferred between the following fund codes: Group Health and Life Benefits Fund 1017, 08 Public Employees Retirement Trust Fund 1029, Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 1034, 09 Judicial Retirement System 1042, National Guard Retirement System 1045. 10 Health Plans Administration 35,678,900 11 Labor Agreements 37,500 12 Miscellaneous Items 13 State Facilities Maintenance and 506,200 506,200 14 Operations 15 Facilities Rent State 506,200 16 Owned 17 Public Communications Services 879,500 779,500 100,000 18 Satellite Infrastructure 879,500 19 Office of Information Technology 68,251,900 68,251,900 20 Helpdesk & Enterprise 5,768,100 21 Support 22 Information Technology 6,090,600 23 Strategic Support 24 Licensing, Infrastructure & 45,667,000 25 Servers 26 Chief Information Officer 10,726,200 27 Risk Management 35,236,600 35,236,600 28 Risk Management 35,236,600 29 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 30 balance on June 30, 2026, of inter-agency receipts collected in the Department of 31 Administration's federally approved cost allocation plan. 01 Legal and Advocacy Services 88,460,900 84,866,000 3,594,900 02 Office of Public Advocacy 41,970,600 03 Public Defender Agency 46,490,300 04 Alaska Public Offices Commission 1,340,900 1,340,900 05 Alaska Public Offices 1,340,900 06 Commission 07 The amount allocated for the Alaska Public Offices Commission includes the unexpended and 08 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of program receipts from lobbyist registration fees, 09 civil penalties, late filing fees, and other fees. 10 Motor Vehicles 22,405,100 21,803,600 601,500 11 Motor Vehicles 22,405,100 12 * * * * * * * * * * 13 * * * * * Department of Agriculture * * * * * 14 * * * * * * * * * * 15 Agriculture 10,061,900 5,599,600 4,462,300 16 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 17 balance on June 30, 2026, of registration and endorsement fees, fines, and penalties under AS 18 03.05.076. 19 Commissioner's Office 571,500 20 Agricultural Development 5,742,300 21 The amount allocated for Agricultural Development includes the unexpended and unobligated 22 balance on June 30, 2026, of the receipts collected by the Department of Natural Resources 23 under AS 37.05.142, AS 37.05.144, and AS 37.05.146 for agricultural development. 24 North Latitude Plant 3,748,100 25 Material Center 26 * * * * * * * * * * 27 * * * * * Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development * * * * * 28 * * * * * * * * * * 29 Executive Administration 12,207,200 1,346,800 10,860,400 30 Commissioner's Office 2,314,600 31 Administrative Services 6,748,800 01 Alaska Broadband Office 3,143,800 02 Banking and Securities 5,610,500 5,560,500 50,000 03 Banking and Securities 5,610,500 04 Community and Regional Affairs 18,964,600 7,451,300 11,513,300 05 Community and Regional 12,705,200 06 Affairs 07 Serve Alaska 6,259,400 08 Revenue Sharing 22,728,200 22,728,200 09 Payment in Lieu of Taxes 10,428,200 10 (PILT) 11 National Forest Receipts 9,200,000 12 Fisheries Taxes 3,100,000 13 Corporations, Business and Professional 23,389,700 21,978,300 1,411,400 14 Licensing 15 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 16 balance on June 30, 2026, of receipts collected under AS 08.01.065(a), (c), and (f) - (i). 17 Corporations, Business and 23,389,700 18 Professional Licensing 19 Investments 6,417,100 6,417,100 20 Investments 6,417,100 21 Insurance Operations 9,315,500 8,741,800 573,700 22 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes up to $1,000,000 of the unexpended 23 and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the Department of Commerce, Community, and 24 Economic Development, Division of Insurance, program receipts from license fees and 25 service fees. 26 Insurance Operations 9,315,500 27 Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation 9,635,900 9,402,700 233,200 28 Commission 29 Alaska Oil and Gas 9,635,900 30 Conservation Commission 31 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 01 balance on June 30, 2026, of the Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission receipts 02 account for regulatory cost charges collected under AS 31.05.093. 03 Alcohol and Marijuana Control Office 5,065,000 5,065,000 04 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 05 balance on June 30, 2026, of the Department of Commerce, Community and Economic 06 Development, Alcohol and Marijuana Control Office, program receipts from the licensing and 07 application fees related to the regulation of alcohol and marijuana. 08 Alcohol and Marijuana 5,065,000 09 Control Office 10 Alaska Gasline Development Corporation 5,506,200 2,263,000 3,243,200 11 Alaska Gasline 5,506,200 12 Development Corporation 13 Alaska Energy Authority 24,584,300 7,833,300 16,751,000 14 Railbelt Transmission 2,229,700 15 Organization 16 Alaska Energy Authority 1,199,000 17 Owned Facilities 18 Alaska Energy Authority 14,178,500 19 Rural Energy Assistance 20 Alaska Energy Authority 588,900 21 Power Cost Equalization 22 Statewide Project 6,388,200 23 Development, Alternative 24 Energy and Efficiency 25 Alaska Industrial Development and 12,776,600 12,776,600 26 Export Authority 27 Alaska Industrial 12,278,100 28 Development and Export 29 Authority 30 Alaska Industrial 498,500 31 Development Corporation 01 Facilities Maintenance 02 Alaska Seafood Marketing Institute 26,626,200 26,626,200 03 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 04 balance on June 30, 2026, of the statutory designated program receipts from the seafood 05 marketing assessment (AS 16.51.120) and other statutory designated program receipts of the 06 Alaska Seafood Marketing Institute. 07 Alaska Seafood Marketing 26,626,200 08 Institute 09 Regulatory Commission of Alaska 11,244,800 11,076,200 168,600 10 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 11 balance on June 30, 2026, of the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic 12 Development, Regulatory Commission of Alaska receipts account for regulatory cost charges 13 under AS 42.05.254, AS 42.06.286, and AS 42.08.380. 14 Regulatory Commission of 11,244,800 15 Alaska 16 Facility Maintenance and Operations 3,121,300 599,200 2,522,100 17 Facilities Rent State 1,614,500 18 Owned 19 Facilities Rent Non-State 1,506,800 20 Owned 21 * * * * * * * * * * 22 * * * * * Department of Corrections * * * * * 23 * * * * * * * * * * 24 Facility Operations and Maintenance 28,568,200 13,758,800 14,809,400 25 24 Hour Institutional Utilities 11,882,000 26 Non-Institutional Utilities 42,500 27 24 Hour Institutional 11,042,200 28 Maintenance 29 Non-Institutional 5,300 30 Maintenance & Operations 31 Non-State Owned Leases 2,000,000 01 Facility-Capital 1,806,300 02 Improvement Unit 03 DOC State Facilities Rent 1,789,900 04 Administration and Support 14,039,500 13,226,100 813,400 05 Office of the Commissioner 2,810,600 06 Administrative Services 6,054,500 07 Information Technology MIS 4,044,200 08 Research and Records 1,130,200 09 Population Management 326,631,600 317,418,600 9,213,000 10 Peer Support and Wellness 535,900 11 Program 12 Recruitment and Retention 830,200 13 Correctional Academy 2,159,700 14 Institution Director's Office 2,798,600 15 Classification and Furlough 1,751,800 16 Out-of-State Contractual 300,000 17 Inmate Transportation 3,472,000 18 Point of Arrest 628,700 19 Anchorage Correctional 42,292,300 20 Complex 21 The amount allocated for the Anchorage Correctional Complex includes the unexpended and 22 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of federal receipts received by the Department of 23 Corrections through manday billings. 24 Anvil Mountain Correctional 9,723,600 25 Center 26 Combined Hiland Mountain 19,981,100 27 Correctional Center 28 Fairbanks Correctional 16,792,500 29 Center 30 Goose Creek Correctional 54,294,700 31 Center 01 Ketchikan Correctional 6,595,100 02 Center 03 Lemon Creek Correctional 15,588,100 04 Center 05 Matanuska-Susitna 9,163,300 06 Correctional Center 07 Palmer Correctional Center 18,402,500 08 Spring Creek Correctional 28,040,500 09 Center 10 Wildwood Correctional 20,527,000 11 Center 12 Yukon-Kuskokwim 13,212,200 13 Correctional Center 14 Point MacKenzie 6,374,800 15 Correctional Farm 16 Probation and Parole 1,692,600 17 Director's Office 18 Pre-Trial Services 18,471,700 19 Statewide Probation and 22,001,400 20 Parole 21 Regional and Community 8,909,400 22 Jails 23 Parole Board 2,091,900 24 Community Residential Centers 19,818,200 19,818,200 25 Community Residential 19,818,200 26 Centers 27 Electronic Monitoring 3,156,100 3,156,100 28 Electronic Monitoring 3,156,100 29 The amount allocated for Electronic Monitoring includes the unexpended and unobligated 30 balance on June 30, 2026, of program receipts from electronic monitoring fees. 31 Health and Rehabilitation Services 87,508,400 80,326,100 7,182,300 01 Health and Rehabilitation 1,882,800 02 Director's Office 03 Physical Health Care 73,187,700 04 Behavioral Health Care 4,095,800 05 Substance Abuse 4,254,200 06 Treatment Program 07 Sex Offender Management 3,163,600 08 Program 09 Domestic Violence 175,000 10 Program 11 Reentry Unit 749,300 12 Offender Habilitation 1,663,800 1,507,500 156,300 13 Education Programs 1,057,800 14 Vocational Education 606,000 15 Programs 16 Recidivism Reduction Grants 1,770,200 770,200 1,000,000 17 Recidivism Reduction 1,770,200 18 Grants 19 * * * * * * * * * * 20 * * * * * Department of Education and Early Development * * * * * 21 * * * * * * * * * * 22 K-12 Aid to School Districts 20,791,000 20,791,000 23 Foundation Program 20,791,000 24 K-12 Support 14,488,600 14,488,600 25 Residential Schools 9,307,000 26 Program 27 Youth in Detention 1,100,000 28 Special Schools 4,081,600 29 Education Support and Admin Services 315,052,200 68,305,700 246,746,500 30 Executive Administration 1,886,300 31 Administrative Services 2,915,400 01 Information Services 2,570,600 02 Broadband Assistance 21,017,300 03 Grants 04 School Finance & Facilities 3,074,900 05 Child Nutrition 77,482,400 06 Student and School 176,183,400 07 Achievement 08 Career and Technical 7,785,900 09 Education 10 Teacher Certification 988,700 11 The amount allocated for Teacher Certification includes the unexpended and unobligated 12 balance on June 30, 2026, of the Department of Education and Early Development receipts 13 from teacher certification fees under AS 14.20.020(c). 14 Early Learning Coordination 14,947,400 15 Pre-Kindergarten Grants 6,199,900 16 Alaska State Council on the Arts 4,239,300 927,500 3,311,800 17 Alaska State Council on 4,239,300 18 the Arts 19 Commissions and Boards 301,400 301,400 20 Professional Teaching 301,400 21 Practices Commission 22 Mt. Edgecumbe High School 16,891,300 6,505,400 10,385,900 23 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 24 balance on June 30, 2026, of inter-agency receipts collected by Mt. Edgecumbe High School, 25 not to exceed the amount authorized in AS 14.17.505(a). 26 Mt. Edgecumbe High 14,981,500 27 School 28 Mt. Edgecumbe Aquatic 614,100 29 Center 30 The amount allocated for Mt. Edgecumbe Aquatic Center includes the unexpended and 31 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of program receipts from aquatic center fees. 01 Mt. Edgecumbe High 1,295,700 02 School Facility Operations 03 and Maintenance State 04 Owned 05 Facility Maintenance and Operations 718,200 718,200 06 Facilities Rent State 718,200 07 Owned 08 Alaska State Libraries, Archives and 12,420,300 10,506,400 1,913,900 09 Museums 10 Library Operations 6,170,900 11 Archives 1,780,400 12 Museum Operations 2,719,200 13 The amount allocated for Museum Operations includes the unexpended and unobligated 14 balance on June 30, 2026, of program receipts from museum gate receipts. 15 Online with Libraries 510,500 16 (OWL) 17 Andrew P. Kashevaroff 1,239,300 18 Facility Operations and 19 Maintenance State Owned 20 Alaska Commission on Postsecondary 17,239,300 5,930,700 11,308,600 21 Education 22 Program Administration & 12,099,200 23 Operations 24 WWAMI Medical 5,140,100 25 Education 26 Alaska Student Loan Corporation 11,158,500 11,158,500 27 Loan Servicing 11,158,500 28 Student Financial Aid Programs 30,461,700 30,461,700 29 Alaska Performance 20,307,800 30 Scholarship Awards 31 Alaska Education Grants 10,153,900 01 * * * * * * * * * * 02 * * * * * Department of Environmental Conservation * * * * * 03 * * * * * * * * * * 04 Administration 14,634,500 4,538,900 10,095,600 05 Office of the Commissioner 1,307,700 06 Administrative Services 8,090,500 07 The amount allocated for Administrative Services includes the unexpended and unobligated 08 balance on June 30, 2026, of receipts from all prior fiscal years collected under the 09 Department of Environmental Conservation's federal approved indirect cost allocation plan 10 for expenditures incurred by the Department of Environmental Conservation. 11 State Support Services 2,236,300 12 Facilities Rent Non-State 3,000,000 13 Owned 14 Environmental Health 32,749,900 15,756,300 16,993,600 15 Environmental Health 31,857,300 16 Facilities Operations and 892,600 17 Maintenance State Owned 18 Air Quality 16,179,700 4,620,000 11,559,700 19 Air Quality 16,179,700 20 The amount allocated for Air Quality includes the unexpended and unobligated balance on 21 June 30, 2026, of the Department of Environmental Conservation, Division of Air Quality 22 general fund program receipts from fees collected under AS 46.14.240 and AS 46.14.250. 23 Spill Prevention and Response 26,043,200 16,435,100 9,608,100 24 Spill Prevention and 26,013,200 25 Response 26 SPAR Facilities Rent State 30,000 27 Owned 28 Water 32,560,700 9,036,900 23,523,800 29 The amount allocated for the Division of Water includes the unexpended and unobligated 30 balance on June 30, 2026, of the Department of Environmental Conservation, Division of 31 Water general fund program receipts from fees collected under AS 37.10.052 and 44.46.025 01 for plan review of wastewater treatment and disposal systems, authorization for discharges 02 under general wastewater permits, fees for individual wastewater discharge permits; and fees 03 for other regulatory services related to wastewater treatment and disposal. 04 Water Quality, 32,560,700 05 Infrastructure Support & 06 Financing 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 * * * * * Department of Family and Community Services * * * * * 09 * * * * * * * * * * 10 At the discretion of the Commissioner of the Department of Family and Community Services, 11 up to $7,500,000 may be transferred between all appropriations in the Department of Family 12 and Community Services. 13 Alaska Pioneer Homes 114,975,100 67,078,600 47,896,500 14 Alaska Pioneer Homes 33,964,300 15 Payment Assistance 16 Alaska Pioneer Homes 2,028,400 17 Management 18 Pioneer Homes 67,221,900 19 The amount allocated for Pioneer Homes includes the unexpended and unobligated balance 20 on June 30, 2026, of the Department of Family and Community Services, Pioneer Homes care 21 and support receipts under AS 47.55.030. 22 Facility Rent, Operations, 11,760,500 23 and Maintenance 24 Alaska Psychiatric Institute 44,726,000 7,109,900 37,616,100 25 Alaska Psychiatric Institute 42,318,500 26 Facility Rent, Operations, 2,407,500 27 and Maintenance 28 Children's Services 208,896,900 125,315,500 83,581,400 29 Tribal Child Welfare 5,000,000 30 Compact 31 Children's Services 11,450,800 01 Management 02 Children's Services 1,470,700 03 Training 04 Front Line Social Workers 82,537,100 05 Family Preservation 21,289,100 06 Foster Care Base Rate 23,385,900 07 Foster Care Augmented 4,323,900 08 Rate 09 Foster Care Special Need 9,324,700 10 Subsidized Adoptions & 47,118,500 11 Guardianship 12 Facility Rent, Operations, 2,996,200 13 and Maintenance 14 Juvenile Justice 71,070,000 68,785,200 2,284,800 15 McLaughlin Youth Center 20,102,400 16 Mat-Su Youth Facility 3,227,400 17 Kenai Peninsula Youth 2,591,900 18 Facility 19 Fairbanks Youth Facility 5,016,600 20 Bethel Youth Facility 6,715,200 21 Johnson Youth Center 5,385,400 22 Probation Services 20,873,900 23 Delinquency Prevention 716,000 24 Youth Courts 470,500 25 Juvenile Justice Health 1,488,600 26 Care 27 Facility Rent, Operations, 4,482,100 28 and Maintenance 29 Departmental Support Services 33,997,200 13,246,000 20,751,200 30 Coordinated Health and 9,991,700 31 Complex Care 01 Information Technology 9,117,200 02 Services 03 Public Affairs 1,158,400 04 Commissioner's Office 2,483,200 05 Administrative Services 8,455,100 06 Facility Rent, Operations, 2,791,600 07 and Maintenance 08 * * * * * * * * * * 09 * * * * * Department of Fish and Game * * * * * 10 * * * * * * * * * * 11 The amount appropriated for the Department of Fish and Game includes the unexpended and 12 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of receipts collected under the Department of Fish and 13 Game's federal indirect cost plan for expenditures incurred by the Department of Fish and 14 Game. 15 Commercial Fisheries 96,676,800 66,619,100 30,057,700 16 The amount appropriated for Commercial Fisheries includes the unexpended and unobligated 17 balance on June 30, 2026, of the Department of Fish and Game receipts from commercial 18 fisheries test fishing operations receipts under AS 16.05.050(a)(14), and from commercial 19 crew member licenses. 20 Southeast Region Fisheries 22,044,000 21 Management 22 Central Region Fisheries 13,757,800 23 Management 24 AYK Region Fisheries 12,975,100 25 Management 26 Westward Region Fisheries 17,603,500 27 Management 28 Statewide Fisheries 25,259,100 29 Management 30 Commercial Fisheries Entry 4,023,400 31 Commission 01 The amount allocated for Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission includes the unexpended 02 and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the Department of Fish and Game, Commercial 03 Fisheries Entry Commission program receipts from licenses, permits and other fees. 04 Comm Fish Facility 911,900 05 Operations and Maintenance 06 State Owned 07 Comm Fish Facility 102,000 08 Operations and Maintenance 09 Non-State Owned 10 Sport Fisheries 48,702,900 1,987,900 46,715,000 11 Sport Fisheries 48,445,200 12 Sport Fish Facility 237,700 13 Operations and Maintenance 14 State Owned 15 Sport Fish Facility 20,000 16 Operations and Maintenance 17 Non-State Owned 18 Anchorage and Fairbanks Hatcheries 7,539,600 5,723,600 1,816,000 19 Anchorage and Fairbanks 4,867,000 20 Hatcheries 21 Hatcheries Facility 2,672,600 22 Operations and Maintenance 23 State Owned 24 Southeast Hatcheries 1,354,800 1,047,900 306,900 25 Southeast Hatcheries 1,354,800 26 Wildlife Conservation 72,813,300 3,334,200 69,479,100 27 Wildlife Conservation 70,539,900 28 Hunter Education Public 1,853,400 29 Shooting Ranges 30 Wildlife Cons. Facility 400,000 31 Operations and Maintenance 01 State Owned 02 Wildlife Cons. Facility 20,000 03 Operations and Maintenance 04 Non-State Owned 05 Statewide Support Services 36,034,500 5,082,800 30,951,700 06 Commissioner's Office 1,646,400 07 Administrative Services 17,422,700 08 Boards of Fisheries and 1,486,400 09 Game 10 Advisory Committees 584,700 11 EVOS Trustee Council 2,405,300 12 Statewide Support 7,000,000 13 Services Facilities Rent State 14 Owned 15 Statewide Support 1,000,000 16 Services Facilities Rent Non- 17 State Owned 18 Statewide Support 373,400 19 Services Facility Operations 20 and Maintenance State 21 Owned 22 Statewide Support 102,000 23 Services Facility Operations 24 and Maintenance Non-State 25 Owned 26 State Facilities Maintenance 4,013,600 27 and Operations 28 Habitat 6,865,700 4,403,700 2,462,000 29 Habitat 6,851,700 30 Habitat Facility Operations 14,000 31 and Maintenance Non-State 01 Owned 02 Subsistence Research & Monitoring 8,063,700 3,548,900 4,514,800 03 State Subsistence 8,049,700 04 Research 05 Subsistence Facility 14,000 06 Operations and Maintenance 07 Non-State Owned 08 * * * * * * * * * * 09 * * * * * Office of the Governor * * * * * 10 * * * * * * * * * * 11 Executive Operations 17,218,800 16,997,700 221,100 12 Executive Office 14,557,000 13 Governor's House 827,000 14 Contingency Fund 250,000 15 Lieutenant Governor 1,540,000 16 Facilities Operations and 44,800 17 Maintenance State Owned 18 Facilities Rent 1,436,800 1,436,800 19 Facilities Rent State 946,200 20 Owned 21 Facilities Rent Non-State 490,600 22 Owned 23 Office of Management and Budget 3,769,700 3,769,700 24 Office of Management and 3,769,700 25 Budget 26 Elections 6,520,600 6,295,500 225,100 27 Elections 6,520,600 28 Commissions/Special Offices 3,098,300 2,940,700 157,600 29 Human Rights Commission 3,098,300 30 The amount allocated for Human Rights Commission includes the unexpended and 31 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the Office of the Governor, Human Rights 01 Commission federal receipts. 02 * * * * * * * * * * 03 * * * * * Department of Health * * * * * 04 * * * * * * * * * * 05 At the discretion of the Commissioner of the Department of Health, up to $15,000,000 may be 06 transferred between all appropriations in the Department of Health. 07 Behavioral Health 42,792,800 7,015,500 35,777,300 08 Behavioral Health 16,384,600 09 Treatment and Recovery 10 Grants 11 Alcohol Safety Action 4,685,000 12 Program (ASAP) 13 Behavioral Health 18,732,700 14 Administration 15 Behavioral Health 1,777,400 16 Prevention and Early 17 Intervention Grants 18 Alaska Mental Health 118,700 19 Board and Advisory Board 20 on Alcohol and Drug Abuse 21 Suicide Prevention Council 30,000 22 Residential Child Care 1,064,400 23 Health Care Services 27,018,100 12,342,700 14,675,400 24 Health Facilities Licensing 4,288,400 25 and Certification 26 The amount allocated for Health Facilities Licensing and Certification includes the 27 unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of general fund program receipts 28 collected for biennial license fees issued under AS 47.32.050. 29 Residential Licensing 5,879,700 30 Medical Assistance 16,676,700 31 Administration 01 Health Care Services 173,300 02 Facility Operations and 03 Maintenance 04 Public Assistance 316,328,800 123,949,400 192,379,400 05 Alaska Temporary 18,366,900 06 Assistance Program 07 Adult Public Assistance 52,781,300 08 Child Care Benefits 65,738,400 09 General Relief Assistance 605,400 10 Tribal Assistance 14,234,600 11 Programs 12 Permanent Fund Dividend 17,791,500 13 Hold Harmless 14 Energy Assistance 13,123,400 15 Program 16 Public Assistance 12,565,000 17 Administration 18 Public Assistance Field 78,165,700 19 Services 20 Fraud Investigation 2,664,900 21 Quality Control 3,256,700 22 Work Services 10,918,900 23 Women, Infants and 23,522,900 24 Children 25 Public Assistance Facility 2,593,200 26 Operations and Maintenance 27 Public Health 151,785,200 69,596,600 82,188,600 28 Nursing 29,253,500 29 Women, Children and 15,614,100 30 Family Health 31 Public Health 6,522,600 01 Administrative Services 02 Emergency Programs 18,412,600 03 Chronic Disease Prevention 28,471,100 04 and Health Promotion 05 Epidemiology 24,237,100 06 Bureau of Vital Statistics 6,059,800 07 Emergency Medical 3,183,700 08 Services Grants 09 State Medical Examiner 4,502,700 10 Public Health Laboratories 9,952,100 11 Public Health Facility 5,575,900 12 Operations and Maintenance 13 Senior and Disabilities Services 64,903,400 36,982,900 27,920,500 14 Senior and Disabilities 22,889,100 15 Community Based Grants 16 Early Intervention/Infant 1,859,100 17 Learning Programs 18 Senior and Disabilities 27,392,300 19 Services Administration 20 General Relief/Temporary 10,154,700 21 Assisted Living 22 Commission on Aging 268,300 23 Governor's Council on 1,502,000 24 Disabilities and Special 25 Education 26 Senior and Disabilities 837,900 27 Services Facility Operations 28 and Maintenance 29 Senior Benefits Payment Program 24,022,600 24,022,600 30 Senior Benefits Payment 24,022,600 31 Program 01 Departmental Support Services 47,477,600 12,024,300 35,453,300 02 Public Affairs 2,297,900 03 Quality Assurance and 1,340,200 04 Audit 05 Commissioner's Office 4,618,100 06 Administrative Support 11,556,600 07 Services 08 Information Technology 20,693,800 09 Services 10 Rate Review 3,346,000 11 Department Support 3,625,000 12 Services Facility Operations 13 and Maintenance 14 Human Services Community Matching 1,387,000 1,387,000 15 Grant 16 Human Services 1,387,000 17 Community Matching Grant 18 Community Initiative Matching Grants 861,700 861,700 19 Community Initiative 861,700 20 Matching Grants (non- 21 statutory grants) 22 Medicaid Services 2,992,204,700 664,902,600 2,327,302,100 23 Medicaid Services 2,965,200,200 24 Adult Preventative Dental 27,004,500 25 Medicaid Svcs 26 * * * * * * * * * * 27 * * * * * Department of Labor and Workforce Development * * * * * 28 * * * * * * * * * * 29 Commissioner and Administrative 35,740,100 8,790,600 26,949,500 30 Services 31 Technology Services 6,449,500 01 Commissioner's Office 1,517,800 02 Workforce Investment 14,165,700 03 Board 04 Alaska Labor Relations 664,600 05 Agency 06 Office of Citizenship 478,900 07 Assistance 08 Management Services 5,458,100 09 The amount allocated for Management Services includes the unexpended and unobligated 10 balance on June 30, 2026, of receipts from all prior fiscal years collected under the 11 Department of Labor and Workforce Development's federal indirect cost plan for 12 expenditures incurred by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development. 13 Leasing 1,987,500 14 Labor Market Information 5,018,000 15 Workers' Compensation 14,465,700 14,465,700 16 Workers' Compensation 8,731,500 17 Workers' Compensation 518,300 18 Appeals Commission 19 Workers' Compensation 811,200 20 Benefits Guaranty Fund 21 Second Injury Fund 2,915,900 22 Fishermen's Fund 1,488,800 23 Labor Standards and Safety 13,639,500 8,962,700 4,676,800 24 Wage and Hour 3,149,300 25 Administration 26 The amount allocated for the Wage and Hour Administration includes the unexpended and 27 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the Department of Labor and Workforce 28 Development, Wage and Hour Administration receipts under AS 36.05.045. 29 Mechanical Inspection 4,058,200 30 Occupational Safety and 6,140,400 31 Health 01 Alaska Safety Advisory 291,600 02 Program 03 The amount allocated for the Alaska Safety Advisory Program includes the unexpended and 04 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the Department of Labor and Workforce 05 Development, Alaska Safety Advisory Program receipts under AS 18.60.840. 06 Employment and Training Services 56,150,500 4,543,400 51,607,100 07 Employment and Training 2,300,300 08 Services Administration 09 The amount allocated for Employment and Training Services Administration includes the 10 unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of receipts from all prior fiscal years 11 collected under the Department of Labor and Workforce Development's federal indirect cost 12 plan for expenditures incurred by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development. 13 Workforce Services 26,949,300 14 Unemployment Insurance 26,900,900 15 Vocational Rehabilitation 31,136,300 5,196,000 25,940,300 16 Vocational Rehabilitation 1,366,700 17 Administration 18 The amount allocated for Vocational Rehabilitation Administration includes the unexpended 19 and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of receipts from all prior fiscal years collected 20 under the Department of Labor and Workforce Development's federal indirect cost plan for 21 expenditures incurred by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development. 22 Client Services 19,951,000 23 Disability Determination 6,836,700 24 Special Projects 2,981,900 25 Alaska Vocational Technical Center 16,348,100 10,177,900 6,170,200 26 Alaska Vocational 10,362,500 27 Technical Center 28 The amount allocated for the Alaska Vocational Technical Center includes the unexpended 29 and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of contributions received by the Alaska Vocational 30 Technical Center receipts under AS 21.96.070, AS 43.20.014, AS 43.55.019, AS 43.56.018, 31 AS 43.65.018, AS 43.75.018, and AS 43.77.045 and receipts collected under AS 37.05.146. 01 State Facilities Maintenance 5,985,600 02 and Operations 03 * * * * * * * * * * 04 * * * * * Department of Law * * * * * 05 * * * * * * * * * * 06 Criminal Division 59,829,700 53,577,800 6,251,900 07 First Judicial District 3,867,000 08 Second Judicial District 3,973,800 09 Third Judicial District: 12,429,500 10 Anchorage 11 Third Judicial District: 9,734,200 12 Outside Anchorage 13 Fourth Judicial District 10,081,100 14 Criminal Justice Litigation 6,365,200 15 Criminal Appeals/Special 13,378,900 16 Litigation 17 Civil Division 66,518,100 33,668,000 32,850,100 18 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 19 balance on June 30, 2026, of inter-agency receipts collected in the Department of Law's 20 federally approved cost allocation plan. 21 Deputy Attorney General's 1,559,900 22 Office 23 Civil Defense Litigation 4,847,600 24 Government Services 5,073,800 25 Health, Safety & Welfare 13,860,400 26 Labor, Business & 8,929,600 27 Corporations 28 Legal Support Services 14,762,000 29 Resource Development & 11,385,500 30 Infrastructure 31 Special Litigation & Appeals 6,099,300 01 The amount allocated for Special Litigation and Appeals includes the unexpended and 02 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of designated program receipts of the Department of 03 Law, Special Litigation and Appeals, that are required by the terms of a settlement or 04 judgment to be spent by the state for consumer education or consumer protection. 05 Administration and Support 10,774,400 3,465,200 7,309,200 06 Office of the Attorney 1,011,100 07 General 08 Administrative Services 4,108,500 09 Facility Operations and 42,900 10 Maintenance State Owned 11 Facilities Rent State 1,053,400 12 Owned 13 Facility Operations and 335,500 14 Maintenance Non-State 15 Owned 16 Facilities Rent Non-State 4,223,000 17 Owned 18 * * * * * * * * * * 19 * * * * * Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs * * * * * 20 * * * * * * * * * * 21 Military and Veterans' Affairs 59,198,900 18,555,500 40,643,400 22 Office of the Commissioner 7,982,300 23 Homeland Security and 10,527,300 24 Emergency Management 25 Army Guard Facilities 16,011,400 26 Maintenance 27 Alaska Wing Civil Air 250,000 28 Patrol 29 Air Guard Facilities 8,230,800 30 Maintenance 31 Alaska Military Youth 12,762,500 01 Academy 02 Veterans' Services 2,821,500 03 State Active Duty 525,000 04 Facilities Rent - Non State 88,100 05 Owned 06 Alaska Aerospace Corporation 10,548,900 10,548,900 07 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 08 balance on June 30, 2026, of the federal and corporate receipts of the Department of Military 09 and Veterans' Affairs, Alaska Aerospace Corporation. 10 Alaska Aerospace 3,921,100 11 Corporation 12 Alaska Aerospace 6,627,800 13 Corporation Facilities 14 Maintenance 15 * * * * * * * * * * 16 * * * * * Department of Natural Resources * * * * * 17 * * * * * * * * * * 18 Administration & Support Services 37,718,100 20,921,700 16,796,400 19 Commissioner's Office 2,294,300 20 Office of Project 7,860,700 21 Management & Permitting 22 Administrative Services 4,894,500 23 The amount allocated for Administrative Services includes the unexpended and unobligated 24 balance on June 30, 2026, of receipts from all prior fiscal years collected under the 25 Department of Natural Resource's federal indirect cost plan for expenditures incurred by the 26 Department of Natural Resources. 27 Information Resource 4,484,300 28 Management 29 Interdepartmental 1,516,900 30 Chargebacks 31 State Facilities Maintenance 11,176,900 01 and Operations 02 Recorder's Office/Uniform 4,568,900 03 Commercial Code 04 The amount allocated for Recorder’s Office/Uniform Commercial Code includes the 05 unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the Department of Natural 06 Resources, Recorder's Office, program receipts from the fees collected to support the 07 maintenance and creation of the permanent public record for commerce in Alaska. 08 Public Information Center 921,600 09 Oil & Gas 24,855,300 11,526,600 13,328,700 10 Oil & Gas 24,855,300 11 The amount allocated for Oil & Gas includes the unexpended and unobligated balance on 12 June 30, 2026, not to exceed $7,000,000, of the revenue from the Right-of-Way leases. 13 Fire Suppression, Land & Water 105,532,200 74,587,300 30,944,900 14 Resources 15 Mining, Land & Water 37,860,700 16 The amount allocated for Mining, Land and Water includes the unexpended and unobligated 17 balance on June 30, 2026, not to exceed $5,000,000, of the receipts collected under AS 18 38.05.035(a)(5). 19 Forest Management & 11,289,200 20 Development 21 The amount allocated for Forest Management and Development includes the unexpended and 22 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the timber receipts account (AS 38.05.110). 23 Geological & Geophysical 22,106,300 24 Surveys 25 The amount allocated for Geological & Geophysical Surveys includes the unexpended and 26 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the receipts collected under AS 41.08.045. 27 Fire Suppression 34,276,000 28 Preparedness 29 Parks & Outdoor Recreation 25,772,300 14,999,000 10,773,300 30 Parks Management & 19,115,500 31 Access 01 The amount allocated for Parks Management and Access includes the unexpended and 02 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the receipts collected under AS 41.21.026. 03 Office of History and 6,656,800 04 Archaeology 05 * * * * * * * * * * 06 * * * * * Department of Public Safety * * * * * 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 Fire and Life Safety 7,928,100 6,944,700 983,400 09 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 10 balance on June 30, 2026, of the receipts collected under AS 18.70.080(b), AS 18.70.350(4), 11 AS 18.70.360, AS 18.72.011(b), and AS 18.74.080, in accordance with AS 18.74.210. 12 Fire and Life Safety 7,482,400 13 Alaska Fire Standards 400,700 14 Council 15 FLS Facility Maintenance 45,000 16 and Operations 17 Alaska State Troopers 218,121,400 197,602,000 20,519,400 18 Special Projects 7,464,500 19 Alaska Bureau of Highway 2,361,700 20 Patrol 21 Alaska Bureau of Judicial 5,502,900 22 Services 23 Prisoner Transportation 2,496,700 24 Search and Rescue 243,000 25 Rural Trooper Housing 5,903,200 26 Dispatch Services 7,907,100 27 Statewide Drug and 11,255,800 28 Alcohol Enforcement Unit 29 Alaska State Trooper 96,919,800 30 Detachments 31 Training Academy Recruit 1,985,700 01 Salaries 02 Alaska Bureau of 20,314,800 03 Investigation 04 Aircraft Section 10,905,100 05 Alaska Wildlife Troopers 33,115,300 06 Alaska Wildlife Troopers 5,009,000 07 Marine Enforcement 08 AST Facility Maintenance 6,736,800 09 and Operations 10 Village Public Safety Operations 26,101,400 26,076,400 25,000 11 Village Public Safety 26,097,300 12 Operations 13 VPSO Facility Maintenance 4,100 14 and Operations 15 Alaska Police Standards Council 2,195,100 2,195,100 16 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 17 balance on June 30, 2026, of the receipts collected under AS 12.25.195(c), AS 12.55.039, AS 18 28.05.151, and AS 29.25.074 and receipts collected under AS 18.65.220(7). 19 Alaska Police Standards 2,166,100 20 Council 21 APSC Facility Maintenance 29,000 22 and Operations 23 Integrated Victim Assistance 35,886,000 19,045,400 16,840,600 24 Council on Domestic 30,618,300 25 Violence and Sexual Assault 26 Violent Crimes 2,155,200 27 Compensation Board 28 Victim Services 3,020,200 29 Administration and Support 30 IVA Facility Maintenance 92,300 31 and Operations 01 Statewide Support 62,570,400 43,121,800 19,448,600 02 Commissioner's Office 5,060,500 03 Training Academy 4,502,500 04 The amount allocated for the Training Academy includes the unexpended and unobligated 05 balance on June 30, 2026, of the receipts collected under AS 44.41.020(a). 06 Administrative Services 6,453,100 07 Alaska Public Safety 10,170,800 08 Communication Services 09 (APSCS) 10 Information Systems 5,507,100 11 Criminal Justice Information 16,407,000 12 Systems Program 13 The amount allocated for the Criminal Justice Information Systems Program includes the 14 unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the receipts collected by the 15 Department of Public Safety from the Alaska automated fingerprint system under AS 16 44.41.025(b). 17 Laboratory Services 11,282,700 18 SWS Facility Maintenance 3,186,700 19 and Operations 20 * * * * * * * * * * 21 * * * * * Department of Revenue * * * * * 22 * * * * * * * * * * 23 Taxation and Treasury 92,910,600 24,303,200 68,607,400 24 Tax Division 20,445,400 25 Treasury Division 13,279,800 26 Of the amount appropriated in this allocation, up to $500,000 of budget authority may be 27 transferred between the following fund codes: Group Health and Life Benefits Fund 1017, 28 Public Employees Retirement Trust Fund 1029, Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 1034, 29 Judicial Retirement System 1042, National Guard Retirement System 1045. 30 Unclaimed Property 804,800 31 Alaska Retirement 12,320,000 01 Management Board 02 Of the amount appropriated in this allocation, up to $500,000 of budget authority may be 03 transferred between the following fund codes: Group Health and Life Benefits Fund 1017, 04 Public Employees Retirement Trust Fund 1029, Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 1034, 05 Judicial Retirement System 1042, National Guard Retirement System 1045. 06 Alaska Retirement 35,000,000 07 Management Board Custody 08 and Management Fees 09 Of the amount appropriated in this allocation, up to $500,000 of budget authority may be 10 transferred between the following fund codes: Group Health and Life Benefits Fund 1017, 11 Public Employees Retirement Trust Fund 1029, Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 1034, 12 Judicial Retirement System 1042, National Guard Retirement System 1045. 13 Permanent Fund Dividend 11,060,600 14 Division 15 The amount allocated for the Permanent Fund Dividend includes the unexpended and 16 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the receipts collected by the Department of Revenue 17 for application fees for reimbursement of the cost of the Permanent Fund Dividend Division 18 charitable contributions program as provided under AS 43.23.130(f) and for coordination fees 19 provided under AS 43.23.130(m). 20 Child Support Enforcement 30,989,600 10,068,100 20,921,500 21 Child Support Enforcement 30,989,600 22 Division 23 The amount allocated for the Child Support Enforcement Division includes the unexpended 24 and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the receipts collected by the Department of 25 Revenue associated with collections for recipients of Temporary Assistance to Needy 26 Families and the Alaska Interest program. 27 Administration and Support 9,274,300 2,426,300 6,848,000 28 Commissioner's Office 1,634,200 29 Administrative Services 3,739,300 30 The amount allocated for the Administrative Services Division includes the unexpended and 31 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, not to exceed $300,000, of receipts collected by the 01 department's federally approved indirect cost allocation plan. 02 Criminal Investigations Unit 1,527,800 03 State Facilities Rent 2,373,000 04 Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority 542,300 542,300 05 Mental Health Trust 16,500 06 Operations 07 Long Term Care 493,100 08 Ombudsman Office 09 Long Term Care 32,700 10 Ombudsman Office Facilities 11 Rent 12 Alaska Municipal Bond Bank Authority 1,421,700 1,421,700 13 AMBBA Operations 1,421,700 14 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation 117,329,500 411,200 116,918,300 15 AHFC Operations 114,911,500 16 Alaska Corporation for 530,500 17 Affordable Housing 18 Alaska Sustainable Energy 411,200 19 Corporation 20 Facilities Operations and 1,476,300 21 Maintenance 22 Alaska Permanent Fund Corporation 210,148,100 210,148,100 23 APFC Operations 31,047,700 24 APFC Investment 178,451,400 25 Management Fees 26 Facilities Rent Non State 649,000 27 Owned 28 * * * * * * * * * * 29 * * * * * Department of Transportation and Public Facilities * * * * * 30 * * * * * * * * * * 31 Division of Facilities Services 112,761,000 23,184,400 89,576,600 01 The amount allocated for this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated balance 02 on June 30, 2026, of inter-agency receipts collected by the Department of Transportation and 03 Public Facilities for the maintenance and operations of facilities and leases. 04 Facilities Services 62,122,000 05 Leases 50,639,000 06 Administration and Support 60,114,600 13,351,400 46,763,200 07 Data Modernization & 5,762,300 08 Innovation Office 09 Commissioner's Office 3,104,800 10 Contracting and Appeals 459,000 11 Equal Employment and Civil 1,593,200 12 Rights 13 The amount allocated for Equal Employment and Civil Rights includes the unexpended and 14 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the statutory designated program receipts collected 15 for the Alaska Construction Career Day events. 16 Internal Review 862,700 17 Statewide Administrative 14,316,600 18 Services 19 The amount allocated for Statewide Administrative Services includes the unexpended and 20 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of receipts from all prior fiscal years collected under 21 the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities' federal indirect cost plan for 22 expenditures incurred by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities. 23 Highway Safety Office 2,318,100 24 Information Systems and 7,498,500 25 Services 26 Leased Facilities 2,937,500 27 Statewide Procurement 3,496,400 28 Statewide Aviation 5,761,100 29 The amount allocated for Statewide Aviation includes the unexpended and unobligated 30 balance on June 30, 2026, of the rental receipts and user fees collected from tenants of land 31 and buildings at Department of Transportation and Public Facilities rural airports under 01 AS 02.15.090(a). 02 Program Development and 2,781,200 03 Statewide Planning 04 Measurement Standards & 9,223,200 05 Commercial Vehicle 06 Compliance 07 The amount allocated for Measurement Standards and Commercial Vehicle Compliance 08 includes the unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the Unified Carrier 09 Registration Program receipts collected by the Department of Transportation and Public 10 Facilities. 11 The amount allocated for Measurement Standards and Commercial Vehicle Compliance 12 includes the unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of program receipts 13 collected by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities. 14 Design, Engineering and Construction 149,127,700 3,287,500 145,840,200 15 Central Design, Engineering, 58,327,600 16 and Construction 17 The amount allocated for Central Region Design, Engineering, and Construction includes the 18 unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the general fund program receipts 19 collected by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities for the sale or lease of 20 excess right-of-way. 21 Southcoast Design, 23,405,100 22 Engineering, and 23 Construction 24 The amount allocated for Southcoast Region Design, Engineering, and Construction includes 25 the unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the general fund program 26 receipts collected by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities for the sale or 27 lease of excess right-of-way. 28 Northern Region Design, 44,993,200 29 Engineering, and 30 Construction 31 The amount allocated for Northern Region Design, Engineering, and Construction includes 01 the unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the general fund program 02 receipts collected by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities for the sale or 03 lease of excess right-of-way. 04 Design, Engineering, and 7,017,200 05 Construction Support 06 Services 07 Project Delivery 15,384,600 08 State Equipment Fleet 41,224,900 31,700 41,193,200 09 State Equipment Fleet 41,224,900 10 Highways, Aviation and Facilities 182,524,300 137,378,700 45,145,600 11 The amounts allocated for highways and aviation shall lapse into the general fund on August 12 31, 2027. 13 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 14 balance on June 30, 2026, of general fund program receipts collected by the Department of 15 Transportation and Public Facilities for collections related to the repair of damaged state 16 highway infrastructure. 17 Abandoned Vehicle 100,000 18 Removal 19 Statewide Contracted 915,500 20 Snow Removal 21 Traffic Signal Management 2,389,100 22 Statewide Guardrail and 1,768,900 23 Roadside Hardware Repair 24 Statewide Wayside 420,000 25 Maintenance 26 Central Region Highways 47,775,600 27 and Aviation 28 Northern Region Highways 85,026,200 29 and Aviation 30 Southcoast Region 28,756,600 31 Highways and Aviation 01 Highways and Aviation 6,388,500 02 Support Services 03 Whittier Access and 8,983,900 04 Tunnel 05 The amount allocated for Whittier Access and Tunnel includes the unexpended and 06 unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the Whittier Tunnel toll receipts collected by the 07 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities under AS 19.05.040(11). 08 International Airports 130,828,800 130,828,800 09 International Airport 11,960,600 10 Systems Office 11 Anchorage Airport 5,854,200 12 Administration 13 Anchorage Airport Facilities 30,605,900 14 Anchorage Airport Field 26,967,400 15 and Equipment Maintenance 16 Anchorage Airport 10,019,300 17 Operations 18 Anchorage Airport Safety 19,091,200 19 Fairbanks Airport 3,319,200 20 Administration 21 Fairbanks Airport Facilities 4,779,600 22 Fairbanks Airport Field and 7,534,800 23 Equipment Maintenance 24 Fairbanks Airport 2,438,800 25 Operations 26 Fairbanks Airport Safety 8,257,800 27 * * * * * * * * * * 28 * * * * * University of Alaska * * * * * 29 * * * * * * * * * * 30 University of Alaska 1,148,172,000 667,929,200 480,242,800 31 Budget 59,964,400 01 Reductions/Additions - 02 Systemwide 03 Systemwide Services 41,628,400 04 Systemwide Services 3,678,800 05 Facility Operations and 06 Maintenance State Owned 07 Office of Information 23,472,800 08 Technology 09 Anchorage Campus 248,244,500 10 Anchorage Campus Facility 25,986,000 11 Operations and Maintenance 12 State Owned 13 Small Business 4,479,600 14 Development Center 15 Kenai Peninsula College 15,561,000 16 Kenai Peninsula College 1,923,800 17 Facility Operations and 18 Maintenance State Owned 19 Kodiak College 5,075,200 20 Kodiak College Facility 900,300 21 Operations and Maintenance 22 State Owned 23 Matanuska-Susitna College 12,909,900 24 Matanuska-Susitna College 1,483,000 25 Facility Operations and 26 Maintenance State Owned 27 Prince William Sound 5,361,500 28 College 29 Prince William Sound 1,366,800 30 College Facility Operations 31 and Maintenance State 01 Owned 02 Troth Yeddha' Campus 471,535,200 03 Troth Yeddha' Campus 109,626,100 04 Facility Operations and 05 Maintenance State Owned 06 College of Indigenous 8,691,100 07 Studies 08 College of Indigenous 731,700 09 Studies Facility Operations 10 and Maintenance State 11 Owned 12 Bristol Bay Campus 3,819,900 13 Bristol Bay Campus Facility 325,000 14 Operations and Maintenance 15 State Owned 16 Chukchi Campus 2,054,300 17 Chukchi Campus Facility 232,700 18 Operations and Maintenance 19 State Owned 20 Kuskokwim Campus 5,605,700 21 Kuskokwim Campus 442,600 22 Facility Operations and 23 Maintenance State Owned 24 Northwest Campus 4,487,700 25 Northwest Campus Facility 289,900 26 Operations and Maintenance 27 State Owned 28 UAF Community and 16,800,900 29 Technical College 30 UAF Community & 1,411,500 31 Technical College Facility 01 Operations & Maintenance 02 State Owned 03 Education Trust of Alaska 9,619,900 04 Juneau Campus 42,052,700 05 Juneau Campus Facility 5,268,400 06 Operations and Maintenance 07 State Owned 08 Ketchikan Campus 4,876,800 09 Ketchikan Campus Facility 559,500 10 Operations and Maintenance 11 State Owned 12 Sitka Campus 6,096,200 13 Sitka Campus Facility 1,608,200 14 Operations and Maintenance 15 State Owned 16 * * * * * * * * * * 17 * * * * * Judiciary * * * * * 18 * * * * * * * * * * 19 Alaska Court System 150,899,000 147,663,000 3,236,000 20 Appellate Courts 10,428,100 21 Trial Courts 125,230,900 22 Administration and Support 15,240,000 23 Therapeutic Courts 4,710,100 3,589,100 1,121,000 24 Therapeutic Courts 4,710,100 25 Commission on Judicial Conduct 597,200 597,200 26 Commission on Judicial 597,200 27 Conduct 28 Judicial Council 1,719,800 1,719,800 29 Judicial Council 1,719,800 30 * * * * * * * * * * 31 * * * * * Legislature * * * * * 01 * * * * * * * * * * 02 Budget and Audit Committee 20,334,200 20,334,200 03 Legislative Audit 8,548,500 04 Legislative Finance 9,891,100 05 Budget and Audit 1,894,600 06 Committee Expenses 07 Legislative Council 34,467,900 34,201,500 266,400 08 Administrative Services 9,163,800 09 Council and Subcommittees 784,700 10 Legal and Research 7,116,900 11 Services 12 Select Committee on 382,900 13 Ethics 14 Office of Victims Rights 1,532,600 15 Ombudsman 1,924,000 16 Legislature State Facilities 1,679,400 17 Rent 18 Technology and Information 10,075,700 19 Services Division 20 Security Services 1,807,900 21 Legislative Operating Budget 39,058,400 39,038,400 20,000 22 Legislators' Salaries and 9,772,300 23 Allowances 24 Legislative Operating 13,807,300 25 Budget 26 Session Expenses 15,478,800 27 (SECTION 2 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 2. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 1 02 of this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Department of Administration 05 1002 Federal Receipts 599,600 06 1003 General Fund Match 250,000 07 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 95,184,300 08 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 36,489,500 09 1007 Interagency Receipts 82,474,200 10 1017 Group Health and Life Benefits Fund 43,563,800 11 1023 FICA Administration Fund Account 230,700 12 1029 Public Employees Retirement Trust Fund 11,142,500 13 1033 Surplus Federal Property Revolving Fund 721,900 14 1034 Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 4,261,100 15 1042 Judicial Retirement System 127,100 16 1045 National Guard & Naval Militia Retirement System 314,600 17 1081 Information Services Fund 68,251,900 18 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 1,571,600 19 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $345,182,800 20 Department of Agriculture 21 1002 Federal Receipts 4,057,100 22 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 3,503,000 23 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 1,259,400 24 1007 Interagency Receipts 248,200 25 1021 Agricultural Revolving Loan Fund 350,600 26 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 71,900 27 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 85,100 28 1153 State Land Disposal Income Fund 486,600 29 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $10,061,900 30 Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development 31 1002 Federal Receipts 42,673,800 01 1003 General Fund Match 1,343,500 02 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 13,206,300 03 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 12,855,300 04 1007 Interagency Receipts 18,341,800 05 1012 Railbelt Energy Fund 1,306,200 06 1036 Commercial Fishing Loan Fund 5,387,200 07 1040 Real Estate Recovery Fund 324,800 08 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 18,066,800 09 1062 Power Project Loan Fund 1,045,300 10 1070 Fisheries Enhancement Revolving Loan Fund 761,700 11 1074 Bulk Fuel Revolving Loan Fund 68,900 12 1102 Alaska Industrial Development & Export Authority 10,967,500 13 Receipts 14 1107 Alaska Energy Authority Corporate Receipts 2,122,500 15 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 14,042,300 16 1141 Regulatory Commission of Alaska Receipts 11,076,200 17 1156 Receipt Supported Services 23,698,000 18 1162 Alaska Oil & Gas Conservation Commission 9,402,700 19 Receipts 20 1164 Rural Development Initiative Fund 72,400 21 1169 Power Cost Equalization Endowment Fund 991,100 22 1170 Small Business Economic Development Revolving 68,500 23 Loan Fund 24 1175 Business License and Corporation Filing Fees and 4,200,000 25 Taxes 26 1202 Anatomical Gift Awareness Fund 80,000 27 1210 Renewable Energy Grant Fund 1,482,300 28 1221 Civil Legal Services Fund 306,400 29 1223 Commercial Charter Fisheries RLF 23,200 30 1224 Mariculture Revolving Loan Fund 23,600 31 1227 Alaska Microloan Revolving Loan Fund 11,600 01 1235 Alaska Liquefied Natural Gas Project Fund 3,243,200 02 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $197,193,100 03 Department of Corrections 04 1002 Federal Receipts 9,382,900 05 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 442,781,900 06 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 7,199,700 07 1007 Interagency Receipts 17,172,100 08 1171 Restorative Justice Account 6,619,400 09 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $483,156,000 10 Department of Education and Early Development 11 1002 Federal Receipts 246,021,300 12 1003 General Fund Match 1,401,900 13 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 98,379,100 14 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 2,076,700 15 1007 Interagency Receipts 24,363,600 16 1014 Donated Commodity/Handling Fee Account 542,000 17 1043 Federal Impact Aid for K-12 Schools 20,791,000 18 1106 Alaska Student Loan Corporation Receipts 11,158,500 19 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 2,709,800 20 1145 Art in Public Places Fund 30,000 21 1226 Alaska Higher Education Investment Fund 36,287,900 22 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $443,761,800 23 Department of Environmental Conservation 24 1002 Federal Receipts 45,076,100 25 1003 General Fund Match 6,881,500 26 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 17,968,200 27 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 9,064,900 28 1007 Interagency Receipts 4,536,100 29 1018 Exxon Valdez Oil Spill Trust--Civil 7,500 30 1052 Oil/Hazardous Release Prevention & Response 16,472,600 31 Fund 01 1055 Interagency/Oil & Hazardous Waste 430,500 02 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 7,165,700 03 1093 Clean Air Protection Fund 8,452,500 04 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 30,000 05 1166 Commercial Passenger Vessel Environmental 1,537,000 06 Compliance Fund 07 1205 Berth Fees for the Ocean Ranger Program 2,255,100 08 1230 Alaska Clean Water Administrative Fund 1,146,200 09 1231 Alaska Drinking Water Administrative Fund 1,144,100 10 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $122,168,000 11 Department of Family and Community Services 12 1002 Federal Receipts 86,436,800 13 1003 General Fund Match 95,384,100 14 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 154,389,300 15 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 31,761,800 16 1007 Interagency Receipts 92,996,200 17 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 799,200 18 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 11,897,800 19 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $473,665,200 20 Department of Fish and Game 21 1002 Federal Receipts 93,663,800 22 1003 General Fund Match 1,348,100 23 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 76,364,000 24 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 2,690,000 25 1007 Interagency Receipts 27,903,700 26 1018 Exxon Valdez Oil Spill Trust--Civil 2,597,700 27 1024 Fish and Game Fund 44,574,300 28 1055 Interagency/Oil & Hazardous Waste 130,400 29 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 6,792,200 30 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 10,641,100 31 1109 Test Fisheries Receipts 3,803,100 01 1201 Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission Receipts 7,542,900 02 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $278,051,300 03 Office of the Governor 04 1002 Federal Receipts 157,600 05 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 31,440,400 06 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 446,200 07 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $32,044,200 08 Department of Health 09 1002 Federal Receipts 2,609,515,500 10 1003 General Fund Match 829,477,800 11 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 104,006,000 12 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 14,050,800 13 1007 Interagency Receipts 52,678,100 14 1050 Permanent Fund Dividend Fund 17,791,500 15 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 2,557,100 16 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 32,903,000 17 1168 Tobacco Use Education and Cessation Fund 5,330,900 18 1171 Restorative Justice Account 251,400 19 1247 Medicaid Monetary Recoveries 219,800 20 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $3,668,781,900 21 Department of Labor and Workforce Development 22 1002 Federal Receipts 98,031,700 23 1003 General Fund Match 9,294,500 24 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 16,038,500 25 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 6,430,100 26 1007 Interagency Receipts 15,385,600 27 1031 Second Injury Fund Reserve Account 2,915,900 28 1032 Fishermen's Fund 1,488,800 29 1049 Training and Building Fund 817,600 30 1054 Employment Assistance and Training Program 2,490,200 31 Account 01 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 225,300 02 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 1,577,100 03 1117 Randolph Sheppard Small Business Fund 124,200 04 1151 Technical Vocational Education Program Account 739,000 05 1157 Workers Safety and Compensation Administration 8,673,400 06 Account 07 1172 Building Safety Account 2,297,100 08 1203 Workers' Compensation Benefits Guarantee Fund 811,200 09 1237 Voc Rehab Small Business Enterprise Revolving 140,000 10 Fund 11 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $167,480,200 12 Department of Law 13 1002 Federal Receipts 2,568,700 14 1003 General Fund Match 670,100 15 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 86,898,700 16 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 196,300 17 1007 Interagency Receipts 37,412,300 18 1055 Interagency/Oil & Hazardous Waste 621,000 19 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 506,500 20 1105 Permanent Fund Corporation Gross Receipts 3,191,000 21 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 2,111,700 22 1141 Regulatory Commission of Alaska Receipts 2,851,300 23 1168 Tobacco Use Education and Cessation Fund 94,600 24 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $137,122,200 25 Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs 26 1002 Federal Receipts 36,379,800 27 1003 General Fund Match 9,642,000 28 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 8,912,400 29 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 1,100 30 1007 Interagency Receipts 7,148,300 31 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 4,084,800 01 1101 Alaska Aerospace Corporation Fund 2,932,400 02 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 647,000 03 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $69,747,800 04 Department of Natural Resources 05 1002 Federal Receipts 22,265,400 06 1003 General Fund Match 2,274,800 07 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 68,355,700 08 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 36,938,900 09 1007 Interagency Receipts 17,923,400 10 1055 Interagency/Oil & Hazardous Waste 52,600 11 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 9,128,200 12 1105 Permanent Fund Corporation Gross Receipts 7,968,100 13 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 13,940,500 14 1153 State Land Disposal Income Fund 5,615,300 15 1154 Shore Fisheries Development Lease Program 555,900 16 1155 Timber Sale Receipts 1,550,900 17 1200 Vehicle Rental Tax Receipts 6,731,500 18 1216 Boat Registration Fees 11,600 19 1236 Alaska Liquefied Natural Gas Project Fund I/A 565,100 20 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $193,877,900 21 Department of Public Safety 22 1002 Federal Receipts 41,352,600 23 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 286,618,700 24 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 8,366,700 25 1007 Interagency Receipts 12,468,800 26 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 2,449,300 27 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 204,400 28 1171 Restorative Justice Account 251,400 29 1220 Crime Victim Compensation Fund 1,090,500 30 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $352,802,400 31 Department of Revenue 01 1002 Federal Receipts 91,879,900 02 1003 General Fund Match 9,117,500 03 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 25,333,000 04 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 2,340,200 05 1007 Interagency Receipts 15,616,300 06 1016 CSSD Federal Incentive Payments 2,123,300 07 1017 Group Health and Life Benefits Fund 22,585,900 08 1027 International Airports Revenue Fund 228,300 09 1029 Public Employees Retirement Trust Fund 16,706,600 10 1034 Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 7,714,800 11 1042 Judicial Retirement System 368,700 12 1045 National Guard & Naval Militia Retirement System 166,300 13 1050 Permanent Fund Dividend Fund 11,196,600 14 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 2,911,900 15 1066 Public School Trust Fund 848,800 16 1103 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation Receipts 40,228,100 17 1104 Alaska Municipal Bond Bank Receipts 1,316,700 18 1105 Permanent Fund Corporation Gross Receipts 209,997,700 19 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 355,000 20 1133 CSSD Administrative Cost Reimbursement 1,160,900 21 1226 Alaska Higher Education Investment Fund 418,100 22 1256 Education Endowment Fund 1,500 23 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $462,616,100 24 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities 25 1002 Federal Receipts 5,607,500 26 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 118,082,200 27 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 8,344,200 28 1007 Interagency Receipts 66,207,400 29 1026 Highways Equipment Working Capital Fund 42,158,300 30 1027 International Airports Revenue Fund 131,738,400 31 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 219,887,700 01 1076 Alaska Marine Highway System Fund 2,223,000 02 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 405,200 03 1147 Public Building Fund 15,889,200 04 1200 Vehicle Rental Tax Receipts 8,780,600 05 1214 Whittier Tunnel Toll Receipts 1,849,800 06 1215 Unified Carrier Registration Receipts 704,200 07 1239 Aviation Fuel Tax Account 5,003,600 08 1244 Rural Airport Receipts 9,611,200 09 1245 Rural Airport Receipts I/A 285,100 10 1249 Motor Fuel Tax Receipts 39,803,700 11 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $676,581,300 12 University of Alaska 13 1002 Federal Receipts 229,820,800 14 1003 General Fund Match 4,777,300 15 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 352,354,600 16 1007 Interagency Receipts 21,116,000 17 1048 University of Alaska Restricted Receipts 310,796,300 18 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 4,181,000 19 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 76,504,000 20 1174 University of Alaska Intra-Agency Transfers 148,621,000 21 1234 Special License Plates Receipts 1,000 22 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $1,148,172,000 23 Judiciary 24 1002 Federal Receipts 1,466,000 25 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 153,569,100 26 1007 Interagency Receipts 2,216,700 27 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 335,000 28 1133 CSSD Administrative Cost Reimbursement 339,300 29 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $157,926,100 30 Legislature 31 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 92,918,800 01 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 655,300 02 1007 Interagency Receipts 35,000 03 1171 Restorative Justice Account 251,400 04 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $93,860,500 05 * * * Total Budget * * * $9,514,252,700 06 (SECTION 3 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 3. The following sets out the statewide funding for the appropriations made in sec. 1 02 of this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Unrestricted General Funds 05 1003 General Fund Match 971,863,100 06 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 2,246,304,200 07 1012 Railbelt Energy Fund 1,306,200 08 * * * Total Unrestricted General Funds * * * $3,219,473,500 09 Designated General Funds 10 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 180,720,900 11 1021 Agricultural Revolving Loan Fund 350,600 12 1031 Second Injury Fund Reserve Account 2,915,900 13 1032 Fishermen's Fund 1,488,800 14 1036 Commercial Fishing Loan Fund 5,387,200 15 1040 Real Estate Recovery Fund 324,800 16 1048 University of Alaska Restricted Receipts 310,796,300 17 1049 Training and Building Fund 817,600 18 1052 Oil/Hazardous Release Prevention & Response 16,472,600 19 Fund 20 1054 Employment Assistance and Training Program 2,490,200 21 Account 22 1062 Power Project Loan Fund 1,045,300 23 1070 Fisheries Enhancement Revolving Loan Fund 761,700 24 1074 Bulk Fuel Revolving Loan Fund 68,900 25 1076 Alaska Marine Highway System Fund 2,223,000 26 1109 Test Fisheries Receipts 3,803,100 27 1141 Regulatory Commission of Alaska Receipts 13,927,500 28 1151 Technical Vocational Education Program Account 739,000 29 1153 State Land Disposal Income Fund 6,101,900 30 1154 Shore Fisheries Development Lease Program 555,900 31 1155 Timber Sale Receipts 1,550,900 01 1156 Receipt Supported Services 23,698,000 02 1157 Workers Safety and Compensation Administration 8,673,400 03 Account 04 1162 Alaska Oil & Gas Conservation Commission 9,402,700 05 Receipts 06 1164 Rural Development Initiative Fund 72,400 07 1168 Tobacco Use Education and Cessation Fund 5,425,500 08 1169 Power Cost Equalization Endowment Fund 991,100 09 1170 Small Business Economic Development Revolving 68,500 10 Loan Fund 11 1172 Building Safety Account 2,297,100 12 1175 Business License and Corporation Filing Fees and 4,200,000 13 Taxes 14 1200 Vehicle Rental Tax Receipts 15,512,100 15 1201 Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission Receipts 7,542,900 16 1202 Anatomical Gift Awareness Fund 80,000 17 1203 Workers' Compensation Benefits Guarantee Fund 811,200 18 1210 Renewable Energy Grant Fund 1,482,300 19 1216 Boat Registration Fees 11,600 20 1221 Civil Legal Services Fund 306,400 21 1223 Commercial Charter Fisheries RLF 23,200 22 1224 Mariculture Revolving Loan Fund 23,600 23 1226 Alaska Higher Education Investment Fund 36,706,000 24 1227 Alaska Microloan Revolving Loan Fund 11,600 25 1234 Special License Plates Receipts 1,000 26 1237 Voc Rehab Small Business Enterprise Revolving 140,000 27 Fund 28 1247 Medicaid Monetary Recoveries 219,800 29 1249 Motor Fuel Tax Receipts 39,803,700 30 * * * Total Designated General Funds * * * $710,046,200 31 Other Non-Duplicated Funds 01 1017 Group Health and Life Benefits Fund 66,149,700 02 1018 Exxon Valdez Oil Spill Trust--Civil 2,605,200 03 1023 FICA Administration Fund Account 230,700 04 1024 Fish and Game Fund 44,574,300 05 1027 International Airports Revenue Fund 131,966,700 06 1029 Public Employees Retirement Trust Fund 27,849,100 07 1034 Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 11,975,900 08 1042 Judicial Retirement System 495,800 09 1045 National Guard & Naval Militia Retirement System 480,900 10 1066 Public School Trust Fund 848,800 11 1093 Clean Air Protection Fund 8,452,500 12 1101 Alaska Aerospace Corporation Fund 2,932,400 13 1102 Alaska Industrial Development & Export Authority 10,967,500 14 Receipts 15 1103 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation Receipts 40,228,100 16 1104 Alaska Municipal Bond Bank Receipts 1,316,700 17 1105 Permanent Fund Corporation Gross Receipts 221,156,800 18 1106 Alaska Student Loan Corporation Receipts 11,158,500 19 1107 Alaska Energy Authority Corporate Receipts 2,122,500 20 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 169,960,600 21 1117 Randolph Sheppard Small Business Fund 124,200 22 1166 Commercial Passenger Vessel Environmental 1,537,000 23 Compliance Fund 24 1205 Berth Fees for the Ocean Ranger Program 2,255,100 25 1214 Whittier Tunnel Toll Receipts 1,849,800 26 1215 Unified Carrier Registration Receipts 704,200 27 1230 Alaska Clean Water Administrative Fund 1,146,200 28 1231 Alaska Drinking Water Administrative Fund 1,144,100 29 1239 Aviation Fuel Tax Account 5,003,600 30 1244 Rural Airport Receipts 9,611,200 31 1256 Education Endowment Fund 1,500 01 * * * Total Other Non-Duplicated Funds * * * $778,849,600 02 Other Duplicated Funds 03 1007 Interagency Receipts 516,243,800 04 1026 Highways Equipment Working Capital Fund 42,158,300 05 1050 Permanent Fund Dividend Fund 28,988,100 06 1055 Interagency/Oil & Hazardous Waste 1,234,500 07 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 279,273,800 08 1081 Information Services Fund 68,251,900 09 1145 Art in Public Places Fund 30,000 10 1147 Public Building Fund 15,889,200 11 1171 Restorative Justice Account 7,373,600 12 1174 University of Alaska Intra-Agency Transfers 148,621,000 13 1220 Crime Victim Compensation Fund 1,090,500 14 1235 Alaska Liquefied Natural Gas Project Fund 3,243,200 15 1236 Alaska Liquefied Natural Gas Project Fund I/A 565,100 16 1245 Rural Airport Receipts I/A 285,100 17 * * * Total Other Duplicated Funds * * * $1,113,248,100 18 Federal Receipts 19 1002 Federal Receipts 3,666,956,900 20 1014 Donated Commodity/Handling Fee Account 542,000 21 1016 CSSD Federal Incentive Payments 2,123,300 22 1033 Surplus Federal Property Revolving Fund 721,900 23 1043 Federal Impact Aid for K-12 Schools 20,791,000 24 1133 CSSD Administrative Cost Reimbursement 1,500,200 25 * * * Total Federal Receipts * * * $3,692,635,300 26 * * * Total Budget * * * $9,514,252,700 27 (SECTION 4 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 4. ALASKA AEROSPACE CORPORATION. Federal receipts and other corporate 02 receipts of the Alaska Aerospace Corporation received during the fiscal year ending June 30, 03 2027, that exceed the amount appropriated in sec. 1 of this Act are appropriated to the Alaska 04 Aerospace Corporation for operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 05 * Sec. 5. ALASKA COURT SYSTEM. The amount necessary, estimated to be $0, not to 06 exceed $75,000, is appropriated from the general fund to the Judiciary, Commission on 07 Judicial Conduct, for special counsel costs for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 08 * Sec. 6. ALASKA HOUSING FINANCE CORPORATION. (a) The board of directors of 09 the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation anticipates that $54,275,000 of the adjusted change 10 in net assets from the second preceding fiscal year will be available for appropriation for the 11 fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 12 (b) The Alaska Housing Finance Corporation shall retain the amount set out in (a) of 13 this section for the purpose of paying debt service for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, in 14 the estimated amount of $2,500,000 for debt service on the bonds authorized under sec. 4, ch. 15 120, SLA 2004. 16 (c) After deductions for the item set out in (b) of this section and deductions for 17 appropriations for operating and capital purposes are made, any remaining balance of the 18 amount set out in (a) of this section for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, is appropriated to 19 the general fund. 20 (d) All unrestricted mortgage loan interest payments, mortgage loan commitment 21 fees, and other unrestricted receipts received by or accrued to the Alaska Housing Finance 22 Corporation during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, and all income earned on assets of 23 the corporation during that period are appropriated to the Alaska Housing Finance 24 Corporation to hold as corporate receipts for the purposes described in AS 18.55 and 25 AS 18.56. The corporation shall allocate its corporate receipts between the Alaska housing 26 finance revolving fund (AS 18.56.082) and senior housing revolving fund (AS 18.56.710(a)) 27 under procedures adopted by the board of directors. 28 (e) The sum of $800,000,000 is appropriated from the corporate receipts appropriated 29 to the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation and allocated between the Alaska housing finance 30 revolving fund (AS 18.56.082) and senior housing revolving fund (AS 18.56.710(a)) under 31 (d) of this section to the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation for the fiscal year ending 01 June 30, 2027, for housing loan programs not subsidized by the corporation. 02 (f) The sum of $30,000,000 is appropriated from the portion of the corporate receipts 03 appropriated to the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation and allocated between the Alaska 04 housing finance revolving fund (AS 18.56.082) and senior housing revolving fund 05 (AS 18.56.710(a)) under (d) of this section that is derived from arbitrage earnings to the 06 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for housing 07 loan programs and projects subsidized by the corporation. 08 * Sec. 7. ALASKA INDUSTRIAL DEVELOPMENT AND EXPORT AUTHORITY. The 09 sum of $17,000,000 has been declared available by the Alaska Industrial Development and 10 Export Authority board of directors under AS 44.88.088 for appropriation as the dividend for 11 the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. After deductions for appropriations for capital purposes 12 are made, any remaining balance of the amount set out in this subsection is appropriated from 13 the unrestricted balance in the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority revolving 14 fund (AS 44.88.060), the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority sustainable 15 energy transmission and supply development fund (AS 44.88.660), and the Arctic 16 infrastructure development fund (AS 44.88.810) to the general fund. 17 * Sec. 8. ALASKA PERMANENT FUND. (a) The amount required to be deposited under 18 art. IX, sec. 15, Constitution of the State of Alaska, estimated to be $323,012,154, during the 19 fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, is appropriated to the principal of the Alaska permanent 20 fund in satisfaction of that requirement. 21 (b) The amount necessary, when added to the appropriation made in (a) of this 22 section, to satisfy the deposit described under AS 37.13.010(a)(2), estimated to be 23 $108,646,000, during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, is appropriated from the general 24 fund to the principal of the Alaska permanent fund. 25 (c) The sum of $3,996,865,095, as calculated under AS 37.13.140(b), is appropriated 26 from the earnings reserve account (AS 37.13.145) as follows: 27 (1) the amount authorized under AS 37.13.145(b) for transfer by the Alaska 28 Permanent Fund Corporation on June 30, 2027, estimated to be $2,365,900,000, to the 29 dividend fund (AS 43.23.045(a)) for the payment of permanent fund dividends and for 30 administrative and associated costs for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027; and 31 (2) the remaining balance, estimated to be $1,630,965,095, to the general fund 01 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 02 (d) The income earned during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, on revenue from 03 the sources set out in AS 37.13.145(d), estimated to be $26,312,800, is appropriated to the 04 Alaska capital income fund (AS 37.05.565). 05 (e) The amount calculated under AS 37.13.145(c), after the appropriation made in (c) 06 of this section, estimated to be $1,491,000,000, is appropriated from the earnings reserve 07 account (AS 37.13.145) to the principal of the Alaska permanent fund to offset the effect of 08 inflation on the principal of the Alaska permanent fund. 09 * Sec. 9. ALASKA TECHNICAL AND VOCATIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAM 10 ACCOUNT. (a) Four percent of the revenue deposited into the Alaska technical and 11 vocational education program account (AS 23.15.830) in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, 12 estimated to be $1,073,500, is appropriated from the Alaska technical and vocational 13 education program account (AS 23.15.830) to the Department of Education and Early 14 Development for operating expenses of the Galena Interior Learning Academy for the fiscal 15 year ending June 30, 2027. 16 (b) Sixty-six percent of the revenue deposited into the Alaska technical and vocational 17 education program account (AS 23.15.830) in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, estimated 18 to be $17,713,100, is appropriated from the Alaska technical and vocational education 19 program account (AS 23.15.830) to the Department of Labor and Workforce Development for 20 operating expenses of the following institutions, in the following percentages, for the fiscal 21 year ending June 30, 2027: 22 ESTIMATED 23 INSTITUTION PERCENTAGE AMOUNT 24 Alaska Technical Center 9 percent $2,415,400 25 Alaska Vocational Technical 17 percent 4,562,500 26 Center 27 Fairbanks Pipeline Training Center 7 percent 1,878,700 28 Ilisagvik College 6 percent 1,610,300 29 Northwestern Alaska Career 4 percent 1,073,500 30 and Technical Center 31 Partners for Progress in Delta, 3 percent 805,100 01 Inc. 02 Prince of Wales Community 5 percent 1,341,900 03 Learning Center 04 Sealaska Heritage Institute, Inc. 2 percent 536,800 05 Southwest Alaska Vocational 4 percent 1,073,500 06 and Education Center 07 Yuut Elitnaurviat, Inc. People's 9 percent 2,415,400 08 Learning Center 09 (c) Thirty percent of the revenue deposited into the Alaska technical and vocational 10 education program account (AS 23.15.830) in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, estimated 11 to be $8,051,500, is appropriated from the Alaska technical and vocational education program 12 account (AS 23.15.830) to the University of Alaska for operating expenses of the following 13 institutions, in the following percentages, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027: 14 ESTIMATED 15 INSTITUTION PERCENTAGE AMOUNT 16 University of Alaska 25 percent $6,709,600 17 University of Alaska Southeast 5 percent 1,341,900 18 * Sec. 10. DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATION. (a) The amount necessary to fund the 19 uses of the state insurance catastrophe reserve account described in AS 37.05.289(a) is 20 appropriated from that account to the Department of Administration for those uses for the 21 fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 22 (b) The amount necessary to fund the uses of the working reserve account described 23 in AS 37.05.510(a) is appropriated from that account to the Department of Administration for 24 those uses for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 25 (c) The amount necessary to have an unobligated balance of $5,000,000 in the 26 working reserve account described in AS 37.05.510(a) is appropriated from the unexpended 27 and unobligated balance of any appropriation enacted to finance the payment of employee 28 salaries and benefits that is determined to be available for lapse at the end of the fiscal year 29 ending June 30, 2027, to the working reserve account (AS 37.05.510(a)). 30 (d) The amount necessary to maintain, after the appropriation made in (c) of this 31 section, a minimum target claim reserve balance of one and one-half times the amount of 01 outstanding claims in the group health and life benefits fund (AS 39.30.095), estimated to be 02 $10,000,000, is appropriated from the unexpended and unobligated balance of any 03 appropriation that is determined to be available for lapse at the end of the fiscal year ending 04 June 30, 2027, to the group health and life benefits fund (AS 39.30.095). 05 (e) The amount necessary to have an unobligated balance of $50,000,000 in the state 06 insurance catastrophe reserve account (AS 37.05.289(a)), after the appropriations made in (c) 07 and (d) of this section, is appropriated from the unexpended and unobligated balance of any 08 appropriation that is determined to be available for lapse at the end of the fiscal year ending 09 June 30, 2027, to the state insurance catastrophe reserve account (AS 37.05.289(a)). 10 (f) If the amount necessary to cover plan sponsor costs, including actuarial costs, for 11 retirement system benefit payment calculations exceeds the amount appropriated for that 12 purpose in sec. 1 of this Act, after all allowable payments from retirement system fund 13 sources, that amount, not to exceed $500,000, is appropriated from the general fund to the 14 Department of Administration for that purpose for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 15 (g) The amount necessary to cover actuarial costs associated with bills introduced by 16 the legislature, estimated to be $0, is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 17 Administration for that purpose for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 18 * Sec. 11. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE, COMMUNITY, AND ECONOMIC 19 DEVELOPMENT. (a) The unexpended and unobligated balance of federal money 20 apportioned to the state as national forest income that the Department of Commerce, 21 Community, and Economic Development determines would lapse into the unrestricted portion 22 of the general fund on June 30, 2027, under AS 41.15.180(j) is appropriated to home rule 23 cities, first class cities, second class cities, a municipality organized under federal law, or 24 regional educational attendance areas entitled to payment from the national forest income for 25 the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, to be allocated among the recipients of national forest 26 income according to their pro rata share of the total amount distributed under AS 41.15.180(c) 27 and (d) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 28 (b) If the amount necessary to make national forest receipts payments under 29 AS 41.15.180 exceeds the amount appropriated for that purpose in sec. 1 of this Act, the 30 amount necessary to make national forest receipts payments is appropriated from federal 31 receipts received for that purpose to the Department of Commerce, Community, and 01 Economic Development, revenue sharing, national forest receipts allocation, for the fiscal 02 year ending June 30, 2027. 03 (c) If the amount necessary to make payments in lieu of taxes for cities in the 04 unorganized borough under AS 44.33.020(a)(20) exceeds the amount appropriated for that 05 purpose in sec. 1 of this Act, the amount necessary to make those payments is appropriated 06 from federal receipts received for that purpose to the Department of Commerce, Community, 07 and Economic Development, revenue sharing, payment in lieu of taxes allocation, for the 08 fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 09 (d) The amount necessary for the purposes specified in AS 42.45.085(a), estimated to 10 be $44,279,032, not to exceed the amount described in AS 42.45.085(a), is appropriated from 11 the power cost equalization endowment fund (AS 42.45.070(a)) to the Department of 12 Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, Alaska Energy Authority, power cost 13 equalization allocation, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 14 (e) The amount received in settlement of a claim against a bond guaranteeing the 15 reclamation of state, federal, or private land, including the plugging or repair of a well, 16 estimated to be $150,000, is appropriated to the Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation 17 Commission for the purpose of reclaiming the state, federal, or private land affected by a use 18 covered by the bond for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 19 (f) The sum of $1,000,000 is appropriated from program receipts received by the 20 Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, division of insurance, 21 under AS 21 to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, 22 division of insurance, for actuarial support for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2027, and 23 June 30, 2028. 24 (g) Forty percent of the boat receipts collected under AS 05.25.096 during the fiscal 25 year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to be $181,531, not to exceed $200,000, is appropriated 26 to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development for payment as a 27 grant under AS 37.05.316 to the Alaska Marine Safety Education Association for marine 28 safety education for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 29 (h) The amount of federal receipts received for the reinsurance program under 30 AS 21.55 during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, is appropriated to the Department of 31 Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, division of insurance, for the 01 reinsurance program under AS 21.55 for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2027, and June 30, 02 2028. 03 (i) The amount calculated under AS 37.14.620(a), estimated to be $10,000, is 04 appropriated from the Arctic Winter Games Team Alaska trust fund (AS 37.14.600) to the 05 Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development for payment as a grant 06 under AS 37.05.316 to Arctic Winter Games Team Alaska for Arctic Winter Games events 07 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 08 * Sec. 12. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION AND EARLY DEVELOPMENT. (a) Fifty 09 percent of the donations received under AS 43.23.230(b) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 10 2027, estimated to be $467,050, is appropriated to the Department of Education and Early 11 Development to be distributed as grants to school districts according to the average daily 12 membership for each school district, adjusted under AS 14.17.410(b)(1)(A) - (D), for the 13 fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 14 (b) Federal funds received by the Department of Education and Early Development, 15 education support and administrative services, that exceed the amount appropriated to the 16 Department of Education and Early Development, education support and administrative 17 services, in sec. 1 of this Act are appropriated to the Department of Education and Early 18 Development, education support and administrative services, for that purpose for the fiscal 19 year ending June 30, 2027. 20 (c) The proceeds from the sale of state-owned Mt. Edgecumbe High School land in 21 Sitka by the Department of Education and Early Development or the Department of Natural 22 Resources are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education and Early 23 Development, Mt. Edgecumbe High School, for maintenance and operations for the fiscal 24 year ending June 30, 2027. 25 (d) The amount of the fees collected under AS 28.10.421(a)(3) during the fiscal year 26 ending June 30, 2026, for the issuance of celebrating the arts license plates, less the cost of 27 issuing the license plates, estimated to be $80,000, is appropriated from the general fund to 28 the Department of Education and Early Development, Alaska State Council on the Arts, for 29 administration of the celebrating the arts license plate program for the fiscal year ending 30 June 30, 2027. 31 * Sec. 13. DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY AND COMMUNITY SERVICES. The amount of 01 statutory designated program receipts received during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, 02 from the provision of pharmaceuticals to residents of the Alaska Pioneer Homes, estimated to 03 be $3,000,000, is appropriated to the Department of Family and Community Services, Alaska 04 Pioneer Homes, for operation of the pharmacy program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 05 2027. 06 * Sec. 14. DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND GAME. Statutory designated program receipts 07 received for fisheries disasters during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, estimated to be $0, 08 are appropriated to the Department of Fish and Game for fisheries disaster relief for the fiscal 09 years ending June 30, 2027, June 30, 2028, and June 30, 2029. 10 * Sec. 15. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH. Federal receipts received during the fiscal year 11 ending June 30, 2027, for Medicaid services are appropriated to the Department of Health, 12 Medicaid services, for Medicaid services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 13 * Sec. 16. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT. (a) If the 14 amount necessary to pay benefit payments from the workers' compensation benefits guaranty 15 fund (AS 23.30.082) exceeds the amount appropriated for that purpose in sec. 1 of this Act, 16 the additional amount necessary to pay those benefit payments is appropriated for that 17 purpose from the workers' compensation benefits guaranty fund (AS 23.30.082) to the 18 Department of Labor and Workforce Development, workers' compensation benefits guaranty 19 fund allocation, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 20 (b) If the amount necessary to pay benefit payments from the second injury fund 21 (AS 23.30.040(a)) exceeds the amount appropriated for that purpose in sec. 1 of this Act, the 22 additional amount necessary to make those benefit payments is appropriated for that purpose 23 from the second injury fund (AS 23.30.040(a)) to the Department of Labor and Workforce 24 Development, second injury fund allocation, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 25 (c) If the amount necessary to pay benefit payments from the fishermen's fund 26 (AS 23.35.060) exceeds the amount appropriated for that purpose in sec. 1 of this Act, the 27 additional amount necessary to make those benefit payments is appropriated for that purpose 28 from the fishermen's fund (AS 23.35.060) to the Department of Labor and Workforce 29 Development, fishermen's fund allocation, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 30 (d) If the amount of contributions received by the Alaska Vocational Technical Center 31 under AS 21.96.070, AS 43.20.014, AS 43.55.019, AS 43.56.018, AS 43.65.018, 01 AS 43.75.018, and AS 43.77.045 during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, exceeds the 02 amount appropriated to the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, Alaska 03 Vocational Technical Center, in sec. 1 of this Act, the additional contributions are 04 appropriated to the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, Alaska Vocational 05 Technical Center, Alaska Vocational Technical Center allocation, for the purpose of operating 06 the center for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 07 (e) Revenue deposited into the employee assistance and training program account 08 (AS 23.15.625) during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, estimated to be $8,663,500, is 09 appropriated to the Department of Labor and Workforce Development for operating expenses 10 of the following state employment assistance and training programs, for the fiscal year ending 11 June 30, 2027: 12 GRANTEE PROGRAM ESTIMATED AMOUNT 13 Alaska Workforce Investment Board State Training $6,930,800 14 and Employment Program Grantee Program 15 Workforce Services Job Center STEP Program 1,732,700 16 * Sec. 17. DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS' AFFAIRS. (a) Five percent 17 of the average ending market value in the Alaska veterans' memorial endowment fund 18 (AS 37.14.700) for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2024, June 30, 2025, and June 30, 2026, 19 estimated to be $8,676, is appropriated from the Alaska veterans' memorial endowment fund 20 (AS 37.14.700) to the Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs for the purposes specified 21 in AS 37.14.730(b) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 22 (b) The amount of the fees collected under AS 28.10.421(d) during the fiscal year 23 ending June 30, 2027, for the issuance of special request license plates commemorating 24 Alaska veterans, less the cost of issuing the license plates, estimated to be $7,300, is 25 appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs for the 26 maintenance, repair, replacement, enhancement, development, and construction of veterans' 27 memorials for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 28 * Sec. 18. DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES. (a) The interest earned during 29 the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, on the reclamation bond posted by Cook Inlet Energy for 30 operation of an oil production platform in Cook Inlet under lease with the Department of 31 Natural Resources, estimated to be $150,000, is appropriated from interest held in the general 01 fund to the Department of Natural Resources for the purpose of the bond for the fiscal year 02 ending June 30, 2027. 03 (b) The amount necessary for the purposes specified in AS 37.14.820 for the fiscal 04 year ending June 30, 2027, estimated to be $30,000, is appropriated from the mine 05 reclamation trust fund operating account (AS 37.14.800(a)) to the Department of Natural 06 Resources for those purposes for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 07 (c) The amount received in settlement of a claim against a bond guaranteeing the 08 reclamation of state, federal, or private land, including the plugging or repair of a well, 09 estimated to be $50,000, is appropriated to the Department of Natural Resources for the 10 purpose of reclaiming the state, federal, or private land affected by a use covered by the bond 11 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 12 (d) Sixty percent of the boat receipts collected under AS 05.25.096 during the fiscal 13 year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to be $272,298, not to exceed $300,000, is appropriated 14 to the Department of Natural Resources, division of parks and outdoor recreation, for the 15 boating safety program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 16 * Sec. 19. DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE. The amount necessary to pay externally 17 managed investment profit sharing fees, estimated to be $13,600,000, is appropriated to the 18 Department of Revenue from the retirement funds managed by the Alaska Retirement 19 Management Board for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 20 * Sec. 20. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION AND PUBLIC FACILITIES. (a) The 21 sum of $171,463,000 is appropriated to the Department of Transportation and Public 22 Facilities, Alaska marine highway system, for costs associated with operating the marine 23 highway system for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2027, and June 30, 2028, from the 24 following sources: 25 (1) $83,299,600 from federal receipts; 26 (2) $66,366,900 from unrestricted general funds; 27 (3) $1,042,200 from capital improvement project receipts; 28 (4) $20,754,300 from the Alaska marine highway system fund 29 (AS 19.65.060(a)). 30 (b) Section 5, ch. 10, SLA 2025, page 68, lines 1 - 4, is amended to read: 31 Sec. 5. The following appropriation items are for operating expenditures from 01 the general fund or other funds as set out in sec. 6 of this Act to the agencies named 02 for the purposes expressed [FOR THE CALENDAR YEAR] beginning January 1, 03 2026, and ending June 30, 2027 [DECEMBER 31, 2026], unless otherwise indicated. 04 * Sec. 21. OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR. (a) The sum of $2,870,300 is appropriated from 05 the general fund to the Office of the Governor, division of elections, for costs associated with 06 conducting the statewide primary and general elections for the fiscal years ending June 30, 07 2027, and June 30, 2028. 08 (b) After the appropriations made in secs. 10(c) - (e) of this Act, the unexpended and 09 unobligated balance of any appropriation that is determined to be available for lapse at the end 10 of the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, not to exceed $2,000,000, is appropriated to the 11 Office of the Governor, office of management and budget, to support the cost of central 12 services agencies that provide services under AS 37.07.080(e)(2) for the fiscal years ending 13 June 30, 2027, and June 30, 2028, if receipts from approved central services cost allocation 14 methods under AS 37.07.080(e)(2)(B) fall short of the amounts appropriated in this Act. 15 * Sec. 22. BANKCARD SERVICE FEES. (a) The amount necessary to compensate the 16 collector or trustee of fees, licenses, taxes, or other money belonging to the state during the 17 fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, is appropriated for that purpose for the fiscal year ending 18 June 30, 2027, to the agency authorized by law to generate the revenue, from the funds and 19 accounts in which the payments received by the state are deposited. In this subsection, 20 "collector or trustee" includes vendors retained by the state on a contingency fee basis. 21 (b) The amount necessary to compensate the provider of bankcard or credit card 22 services to the state during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, is appropriated for that 23 purpose for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, to each agency of the executive, legislative, 24 and judicial branches that accepts payment by bankcard or credit card for licenses, permits, 25 goods, and services provided by that agency on behalf of the state, from the funds and 26 accounts in which the payments received by the state are deposited. 27 * Sec. 23. DEBT AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS. (a) The amount required to be paid by the 28 state for the principal of and interest on all issued and outstanding state-guaranteed bonds, 29 estimated to be $0, is appropriated from the general fund to the Alaska Housing Finance 30 Corporation for payment of the principal of and interest on those bonds for the fiscal year 31 ending June 30, 2027. 01 (b) The amount necessary for payment of principal and interest, redemption premium, 02 and trustee fees, if any, on bonds issued by the state bond committee under AS 37.15.560 for 03 the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, estimated to be $2,093,900, is appropriated from interest 04 earnings of the Alaska clean water fund (AS 46.03.032(a)) to the Alaska clean water fund 05 revenue bond redemption fund (AS 37.15.565). 06 (c) The amount necessary for payment of principal and interest, redemption premium, 07 and trustee fees, if any, on bonds issued by the state bond committee under AS 37.15.560 for 08 the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, estimated to be $2,186,200, is appropriated from interest 09 earnings of the Alaska drinking water fund (AS 46.03.036(a)) to the Alaska drinking water 10 fund revenue bond redemption fund (AS 37.15.565). 11 (d) The sum of $2,587,792 is appropriated from the general fund to the following 12 agencies for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for payment of debt service on outstanding 13 debt authorized by AS 14.40.257, AS 29.60.700, and AS 42.45.065, respectively, for the 14 following projects: 15 AGENCY AND PROJECT APPROPRIATION AMOUNT 16 (1) University of Alaska $1,222,365 17 Anchorage Community and Technical 18 College Center 19 Juneau Readiness Center/UAS Joint Facility 20 (2) Department of Transportation and Public Facilities 21 (A) Aleutians East Borough/False Pass 218,946 22 small boat harbor 23 (B) Aleutians East Borough/Akutan 91,828 24 small boat harbor 25 (C) Fairbanks North Star Borough 347,310 26 Eielson AFB Schools, major 27 maintenance and upgrades 28 (D) City of Unalaska Little South America 367,389 29 (LSA) Harbor 30 (3) Alaska Energy Authority 339,954 31 Copper Valley Electric Association 01 cogeneration projects 02 (e) The amount necessary for payment of lease payments and trustee fees relating to 03 certificates of participation issued for real property for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, 04 estimated to be $2,889,150, is appropriated from the general fund to the state bond committee 05 for that purpose for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 06 (f) The sum of $3,303,500 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 07 Administration for the purpose of paying the obligation of the Linny Pacillo Parking Garage 08 in Anchorage to the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation for the fiscal year ending June 30, 09 2027. 10 (g) The following amounts are appropriated to the state bond committee from the 11 specified sources, and for the stated purposes, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027: 12 (1) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 13 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2010B, estimated to be 14 $1,889,033 from the amount received from the United States Treasury as a result of the 15 American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, Qualified School Construction Bond 16 interest subsidy payments due on the series 2010B general obligation bonds; 17 (2) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 18 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2010B, after the payment made in 19 (1) of this subsection, estimated to be $15,121,717, from the general fund for that purpose; 20 (3) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 21 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2013A, estimated to be $434,571, 22 from the amount received from the United States Treasury as a result of the American 23 Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, Qualified School Construction Bond interest 24 subsidy payments due on the series 2013A general obligation bonds; 25 (4) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 26 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2013A, after the payments made 27 in (3) of this subsection, estimated to be $26,268, from the general fund for that purpose; 28 (5) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 29 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2020A, estimated to be 30 $6,905,125, from the general fund for that purpose; 31 (6) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 01 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2024A, estimated to be 02 $8,063,375, from the general fund for that purpose; 03 (7) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 04 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2024B, estimated to be 05 $11,332,750, from the general fund for that purpose; 06 (8) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 07 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2025A, estimated to be 08 $19,317,000, from the general fund for that purpose; 09 (9) the amount necessary for payment of trustee fees on outstanding State of 10 Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2010B, 2013A, 2020A, 2024A, 2024B, and 2025A, 11 estimated to be $7,500, from the general fund for that purpose; 12 (10) the amount necessary for the purpose of authorizing payment to the 13 United States Treasury for arbitrage rebate and payment of tax penalties on outstanding State 14 of Alaska general obligation bonds, estimated to be $50,000, from the general fund for that 15 purpose; 16 (11) if the proceeds of state general obligation bonds issued are temporarily 17 insufficient to cover costs incurred on projects approved for funding with these proceeds, the 18 amount necessary to prevent this cash deficiency, from the general fund, contingent on 19 repayment to the general fund as soon as additional state general obligation bond proceeds 20 have been received by the state; and 21 (12) if the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest 22 on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds exceeds the amounts appropriated in 23 this subsection, the additional amount necessary to pay the obligations, from the general fund 24 for that purpose. 25 (h) The following amounts are appropriated to the state bond committee from the 26 specified sources, and for the stated purposes, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027: 27 (1) the amount necessary for debt service on outstanding international airports 28 revenue bonds, estimated to be $2,500,000, from the collection of passenger facility charges 29 approved by the Federal Aviation Administration at the Alaska International Airport System; 30 (2) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and trustee fees on 31 outstanding international airports revenue bonds, after the payment made in (1) of this 01 subsection, estimated to be $22,869,800, from the International Airports Revenue Fund 02 (AS 37.15.430(a)) for that purpose; 03 (3) the amount necessary for payment of principal and interest, redemption 04 premiums, and trustee fees, if any, associated with the early redemption of international 05 airports revenue bonds authorized under AS 37.15.410 - 37.15.550, estimated to be 06 $10,000,000, from the International Airports Revenue Fund (AS 37.15.430(a)); 07 (4) the amount necessary for the purpose of authorizing payment for arbitrage 08 rebate on International Airports revenue bonds, estimated to be $1,500,000, from investment 09 earnings on the bond proceeds deposited in construction funds and the reserve funds of the 10 International Airports for that purpose; and 11 (5) if investment earnings on the bond proceeds deposited in construction 12 funds and the reserve funds of the International Airports are insufficient for payment of 13 arbitrage rebate on International Airports revenue bonds, the amount necessary to maintain 14 sufficiency of the reserve fund requirement, after the payment made in (4) of this subsection, 15 estimated to be $100,000, from the International Airports Revenue Fund (AS 37.15.430(a)) 16 for that purpose. 17 (i) If federal receipts are temporarily insufficient to cover international airports 18 system project expenditures approved for funding with those receipts, the amount necessary to 19 prevent that cash deficiency, estimated to be $0, is appropriated from the general fund to the 20 International Airports Revenue Fund (AS 37.15.430(a)) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 21 2027, contingent on repayment to the general fund, as soon as additional federal receipts have 22 been received by the state for that purpose. 23 (j) The amount of federal receipts deposited in the International Airports Revenue 24 Fund (AS 37.15.430(a)) necessary to reimburse the general fund for international airports 25 system project expenditures, estimated to be $0, is appropriated from the International 26 Airports Revenue Fund (AS 37.15.430(a)) to the general fund. 27 (k) The amount necessary for payment of obligations and fees for the Goose Creek 28 Correctional Center, estimated to be $16,840,000, is appropriated from the general fund to the 29 Department of Administration for that purpose for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 30 (l) The amount necessary, estimated to be $41,636,643, is appropriated to the 31 Department of Education and Early Development for state aid for costs of school construction 01 under AS 14.11.100 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, from the following sources: 02 (1) $9,500,000 from the School Fund (AS 43.50.140); 03 (2) the amount necessary, after the appropriation made in (1) of this 04 subsection, estimated to be $32,136,643, from the general fund. 05 * Sec. 24. FEDERAL AND OTHER PROGRAM RECEIPTS. (a) Federal receipts, 06 designated program receipts under AS 37.05.146(b)(3), information services fund program 07 receipts under AS 44.21.045(b), Exxon Valdez oil spill trust receipts under 08 AS 37.05.146(b)(4), receipts of the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation, receipts of the 09 Alaska marine highway system fund under AS 19.65.060(a), receipts of the University of 10 Alaska under AS 37.05.146(b)(2), receipts of the highways equipment working capital fund 11 under AS 44.68.210, and receipts of commercial fisheries test fishing operations under 12 AS 37.05.146(c)(20) that are received during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, and that 13 exceed the amounts appropriated by this Act are appropriated conditioned on compliance with 14 the program review provisions of AS 37.07.080(h). Receipts received under this subsection 15 during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, do not include the balance of a state fund on 16 June 30, 2026. 17 (b) If federal or other program receipts under AS 37.05.146 and AS 44.21.045(b) that 18 are received during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, exceed the amounts appropriated by 19 this Act, the appropriations from state funds for the affected program shall be reduced by the 20 excess if the reductions are consistent with applicable federal statutes. 21 (c) If federal or other program receipts under AS 37.05.146 and AS 44.21.045(b) that 22 are received during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, fall short of the amounts 23 appropriated by this Act, the affected appropriation is reduced by the amount of the shortfall 24 in receipts. 25 (d) The amount of designated program receipts under AS 37.05.146(b)(3) 26 appropriated in this Act includes the unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, 27 of designated program receipts collected under AS 37.05.146(b)(3) for that purpose. 28 * Sec. 25. FUND CAPITALIZATION. (a) The portions of the fees listed in this subsection 29 that are collected during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, estimated to be $16,000, are 30 appropriated to the Alaska children's trust grant account (AS 37.14.205(a)): 31 (1) fees collected under AS 18.50.225, less the cost of supplies, for the 01 issuance of heirloom birth certificates; 02 (2) fees collected under AS 18.50.272, less the cost of supplies, for the 03 issuance of heirloom marriage certificates; 04 (3) fees collected under AS 28.10.421(d) for the issuance of special request 05 Alaska children's trust license plates, less the cost of issuing the license plates. 06 (b) The amount of federal receipts received for disaster relief during the fiscal year 07 ending June 30, 2027, estimated to be $9,000,000, is appropriated to the disaster relief fund 08 (AS 26.23.300(a)). 09 (c) The sum of $24,000,000 is appropriated from the general fund to the disaster relief 10 fund (AS 26.23.300(a)). 11 (d) The sum of $40,000,000 is appropriated from the general fund to the disaster relief 12 fund (AS 26.23.300(a)). 13 (e) Twenty-five percent of the donations received under AS 43.23.230(b), estimated 14 to be $233,525, is appropriated to the dividend raffle fund (AS 43.23.230(a)). 15 (f) The amount of municipal bond bank receipts determined under AS 44.85.270(h) to 16 be available for transfer by the Alaska Municipal Bond Bank Authority for the fiscal year 17 ending June 30, 2026, estimated to be $0, is appropriated to the Alaska municipal bond bank 18 authority reserve fund (AS 44.85.270(a)). 19 (g) If the Alaska Municipal Bond Bank Authority must draw on the Alaska municipal 20 bond bank authority reserve fund (AS 44.85.270(a)) because of a default by a borrower, an 21 amount equal to the amount drawn from the reserve is appropriated from the general fund to 22 the Alaska municipal bond bank authority reserve fund (AS 44.85.270(a)). 23 (h) The amount necessary, estimated to be $1,271,451,445, when added to the balance 24 of the public education fund (AS 14.17.300) on June 30, 2026, to fund the total amount for the 25 fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, of state aid calculated under the public school funding 26 formula under AS 14.17.410(b) is appropriated to the public education fund (AS 14.17.300) 27 from the following sources: 28 (1) $37,498,365 from the public school trust fund (AS 37.14.110(a)); 29 (2) the amount necessary, after the appropriation made in (1) of this 30 subsection, estimated to be $1,233,953,080, from the general fund. 31 (i) The amount necessary to fund transportation of students under AS 14.09.010 for 01 the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, estimated to be $72,826,112, is appropriated from the 02 general fund to the public education fund (AS 14.17.300). 03 (j) The sum of $19,603,000 is appropriated from the general fund to the regional 04 educational attendance area and small municipal school district school fund 05 (AS 14.11.030(a)). 06 (k) The amount necessary to pay medical insurance premiums for eligible surviving 07 dependents under AS 39.60.040 and the costs of the Department of Public Safety associated 08 with administering the peace officer and firefighter survivors' fund (AS 39.60.010) for the 09 fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, estimated to be $60,000, is appropriated from the general 10 fund to the peace officer and firefighter survivors' fund (AS 39.60.010) for that purpose. 11 (l) The amount of federal receipts awarded or received for capitalization of the Alaska 12 clean water fund (AS 46.03.032(a)) during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, less the 13 amount expended for administering the loan fund and other eligible activities, estimated to be 14 $26,461,500, is appropriated from federal receipts to the Alaska clean water fund 15 (AS 46.03.032(a)). 16 (m) The amount necessary to match federal receipts awarded or received for 17 capitalization of the Alaska clean water fund (AS 46.03.032(a)) during the fiscal year ending 18 June 30, 2027, estimated to be $5,037,700, is appropriated to the Alaska clean water fund 19 (AS 46.03.032(a)) from the following sources: 20 (1) the amount available for appropriation from Alaska clean water fund 21 revenue bond receipts, estimated to be $2,088,900; 22 (2) the amount necessary, after the appropriation made in (1) of this 23 subsection, not to exceed $2,948,800, from the general fund. 24 (n) The amount of federal receipts awarded or received for capitalization of the 25 Alaska drinking water fund (AS 46.03.036(a)) during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, 26 less the amount expended for administering the loan fund and other eligible activities, 27 estimated to be $35,353,500, is appropriated from federal receipts to the Alaska drinking 28 water fund (AS 46.03.036(a)). 29 (o) The amount necessary to match federal receipts awarded or received for 30 capitalization of the Alaska drinking water fund (AS 46.03.036(a)) during the fiscal year 31 ending June 30, 2027, estimated to be $7,160,800, is appropriated to the Alaska drinking 01 water fund (AS 46.03.036(a)) from the following sources: 02 (1) the amount available for appropriation from Alaska drinking water fund 03 revenue bond receipts, estimated to be $2,181,200; 04 (2) the amount necessary, after the appropriation made in (1) of this 05 subsection, not to exceed $4,979,600, from the general fund. 06 (p) The amount received under AS 18.67.162 as program receipts, estimated to be 07 $85,000, including donations and recoveries of or reimbursement for awards made from the 08 crime victim compensation fund (AS 18.67.162), during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, 09 is appropriated to the crime victim compensation fund (AS 18.67.162). 10 (q) The sum of $1,005,480 is appropriated from that portion of the dividend fund 11 (AS 43.23.045(a)) that would have been paid to individuals who are not eligible to receive a 12 permanent fund dividend because of a conviction or incarceration under AS 43.23.005(d) to 13 the crime victim compensation fund (AS 18.67.162) for the purposes of the crime victim 14 compensation fund (AS 18.67.162). 15 (r) An amount equal to the interest earned on amounts in the election fund required by 16 the federal Help America Vote Act, estimated to be $250,000, is appropriated to the election 17 fund for use in accordance with 52 U.S.C. 21004(b)(2). 18 (s) The vaccine assessment program receipts collected under AS 18.09.220 during the 19 fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, estimated to be $20,000,000, are appropriated to the vaccine 20 assessment fund (AS 18.09.230). 21 (t) The sum of $14,022,000 is appropriated from the power cost equalization 22 endowment fund (AS 42.45.070) to the community assistance fund (AS 29.60.850). 23 (u) The amount necessary, estimated to be $26,000,000, for fire suppression activities 24 during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, is appropriated to the fire suppression fund 25 (AS 41.15.210) from the following sources: 26 (1) $20,500,000 from federal receipts; 27 (2) $500,000 from interagency receipts; and 28 (3) $5,000,000 from statutory designated program receipts. 29 (v) The sum of $47,482,700 is appropriated from the general fund to the fire 30 suppression fund (AS 41.15.210). 31 * Sec. 26. FUND TRANSFERS. (a) The federal funds received by the state under 42 U.S.C. 01 6506a(l) or former 42 U.S.C. 6508 not appropriated for grants under AS 37.05.530(d) are 02 appropriated as follows: 03 (1) to the principal of the Alaska permanent fund (art. IX, sec. 15, Constitution 04 of the State of Alaska) and the public school trust fund (AS 37.14.110(a)), according to 05 AS 37.05.530(g)(1) and (2); and 06 (2) to the principal of the Alaska permanent fund (art. IX, sec. 15, Constitution 07 of the State of Alaska), the public school trust fund (AS 37.14.110(a)), and the power cost 08 equalization endowment fund (AS 42.45.070(a)), according to AS 37.05.530(g)(3). 09 (b) An amount equal to 10 percent of the filing fees received by the Alaska Court 10 System during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, estimated to be $306,380, is appropriated 11 from the general fund to the civil legal services fund (AS 37.05.590) for the purpose of 12 making appropriations from the fund to organizations that provide civil legal services to low- 13 income individuals. 14 (c) The following amounts are appropriated to the oil and hazardous substance release 15 prevention account (AS 46.08.010(a)(1)) in the oil and hazardous substance release 16 prevention and response fund (AS 46.08.010(a)) from the sources indicated: 17 (1) the balance of the oil and hazardous substance release prevention 18 mitigation account (AS 46.08.020(b)) in the general fund on June 30, 2026, estimated to be 19 $1,528,300, not otherwise appropriated by this Act; 20 (2) the amount collected for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to 21 be $6,080,000, from the surcharge levied under AS 43.55.300; and 22 (3) the amount collected for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to 23 be $6,100,000, from the surcharge levied under AS 43.40.005. 24 (d) The following amounts are appropriated to the oil and hazardous substance release 25 response account (AS 46.08.010(a)(2)) in the oil and hazardous substance release prevention 26 and response fund (AS 46.08.010(a)) from the following sources: 27 (1) the balance of the oil and hazardous substance release response mitigation 28 account (AS 46.08.025(b)) in the general fund on June 30, 2026, estimated to be $700,000, 29 not otherwise appropriated by this Act; and 30 (2) the amount collected for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to 31 be $1,520,000, from the surcharge levied under AS 43.55.201. 01 (e) The unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, estimated to be 02 $2,000,000, of the Alaska clean water administrative income account (AS 46.03.034(a)(2)) in 03 the Alaska clean water administrative fund (AS 46.03.034) is appropriated to the Alaska clean 04 water administrative operating account (AS 46.03.034(a)(1)) in the Alaska clean water 05 administrative fund (AS 46.03.034). 06 (f) The unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, estimated to be 07 $1,000,000, of the Alaska drinking water administrative income account (AS 46.03.038(a)(2)) 08 in the Alaska drinking water administrative fund (AS 46.03.038) is appropriated to the Alaska 09 drinking water administrative operating account (AS 46.03.038(a)(1)) in the Alaska drinking 10 water administrative fund (AS 46.03.038). 11 (g) An amount equal to the interest earned on amounts in the special aviation fuel tax 12 account (AS 43.40.010(e)) during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, is appropriated to the 13 special aviation fuel tax account (AS 43.40.010(e)). 14 (h) An amount equal to the revenue collected from the following sources during the 15 fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, estimated to be $1,318,000, is appropriated to the fish and 16 game fund (AS 16.05.100): 17 (1) range fees collected at shooting ranges operated by the Department of Fish 18 and Game (AS 16.05.050(a)(15)), estimated to be $500,000; 19 (2) receipts from the sale of waterfowl conservation stamp limited edition 20 prints (AS 16.05.826(a)), estimated to be $3,000; 21 (3) fees collected for sanctuary access permits (AS 16.05.050(a)(15)), 22 estimated to be $125,000; and 23 (4) fees collected at hunter, boating, and angling access sites managed by the 24 Department of Natural Resources, division of parks and outdoor recreation, under a 25 cooperative agreement authorized under AS 16.05.050(a)(6), estimated to be $690,000. 26 (i) The amount necessary for the purposes specified in AS 37.14.820 for the fiscal 27 year ending June 30, 2027, estimated to be $30,000, is appropriated from the mine 28 reclamation trust fund income account (AS 37.14.800(a)) to the mine reclamation trust fund 29 operating account (AS 37.14.800(a)). 30 (j) Twenty-five percent of the donations received under AS 43.23.230(b), estimated to 31 be $233,525, is appropriated to the education endowment fund (AS 43.23.220). 01 (k) The unexpended and unobligated balance of the large passenger vessel gaming 02 and gambling tax account (AS 43.35.220) on June 30, 2027, estimated to be $30,439,000, is 03 appropriated to the general fund. 04 (l) The proceeds received from the sale of Alaska marine highway system assets 05 during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, are appropriated to the Alaska marine highway 06 system vessel replacement fund (AS 37.05.550). 07 * Sec. 27. RETIREMENT SYSTEM FUNDING. (a) The sum of $75,283,000 is 08 appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Administration for deposit in the 09 defined benefit plan account in the public employees' retirement system as an additional state 10 contribution under AS 39.35.280 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 11 (b) The sum of $157,201,000 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department 12 of Administration for deposit in the defined benefit plan account in the teachers' retirement 13 system as an additional state contribution under AS 14.25.085 for the fiscal year ending 14 June 30, 2027. 15 (c) The sum of $1,436,710 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 16 Administration to pay benefit payments to eligible members and survivors of eligible 17 members earned under the elected public officers' retirement system for the fiscal year ending 18 June 30, 2027. 19 * Sec. 28. SALARY AND BENEFIT ADJUSTMENTS. (a) The operating budget 20 appropriations made in sec. 1 of this Act include amounts for salary and benefit adjustments 21 for public officials, officers, and employees of the executive branch, Alaska Court System 22 employees, employees of the legislature, and legislators and to implement the monetary terms 23 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, of the following ongoing collective bargaining 24 agreements: 25 (1) Public Employees Local 71, for the labor, trades, and crafts unit; 26 (2) Alaska Public Employees Association, for the supervisory unit; 27 (3) Teachers' Education Association of Mt. Edgecumbe, representing the 28 teachers of Mt. Edgecumbe High School; 29 (4) Alaska Vocational Technical Center Teachers' Association, National 30 Education Association, representing the employees of the Alaska Vocational Technical 31 Center; 01 (5) International Organization of Masters, Mates, and Pilots, representing the 02 masters, mates, and pilots unit; 03 (6) Alaska State Employees Association, for the general government unit; 04 (7) Marine Engineers' Beneficial Association, representing licensed engineers 05 employed by the Alaska marine highway system; 06 (8) Confidential Employees Association, representing the confidential unit; 07 (9) Inlandboatmen's Union of the Pacific, Alaska Region, representing the 08 unlicensed marine unit. 09 (b) The operating budget appropriations made to the University of Alaska in sec. 1 of 10 this Act include amounts for salary and benefit adjustments to implement the monetary terms 11 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, of the following collective bargaining agreements: 12 (1) Alaska Graduate Workers Association/UAW; 13 (2) United Academics - American Association of University Professors, 14 American Federation of Teachers; 15 (3) United Academic - Adjuncts - American Association of University 16 Professors, American Federation of Teachers. 17 (c) If a collective bargaining agreement listed in (a) of this section is not ratified by 18 the membership of the respective collective bargaining unit, the appropriations made in this 19 Act applicable to the collective bargaining unit's agreement are adjusted proportionately by 20 the amount for that collective bargaining agreement, and the corresponding funding source 21 amounts are adjusted accordingly. 22 (d) If a collective bargaining agreement listed in (b) of this section is not ratified by 23 the membership of the respective collective bargaining unit and approved by the Board of 24 Regents of the University of Alaska, the appropriations made in this Act applicable to the 25 collective bargaining unit's agreement are adjusted proportionately by the amount for that 26 collective bargaining agreement, and the corresponding funding source amounts are adjusted 27 accordingly. 28 * Sec. 29. SHARED TAXES AND FEES. (a) An amount equal to the salmon enhancement 29 tax collected under AS 43.76.001 - 43.76.028 in calendar year 2025, estimated to be 30 $4,858,000, and deposited in the general fund under AS 43.76.025(c), is appropriated from 31 the general fund to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development 01 for payment in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, to qualified regional associations 02 operating within a region designated under AS 16.10.375. 03 (b) An amount equal to the seafood development tax collected under AS 43.76.350 - 04 43.76.399 in calendar year 2025, estimated to be $2,278,000, and deposited in the general 05 fund under AS 43.76.380(d), is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 06 Commerce, Community, and Economic Development for payment in the fiscal year ending 07 June 30, 2027, to qualified regional seafood development associations for the following 08 purposes: 09 (1) promotion of seafood and seafood byproducts that are harvested in the 10 region and processed for sale; 11 (2) promotion of improvements to the commercial fishing industry and 12 infrastructure in the seafood development region; 13 (3) establishment of education, research, advertising, or sales promotion 14 programs for seafood products harvested in the region; 15 (4) preparation of market research and product development plans for the 16 promotion of seafood and seafood byproducts that are harvested in the region and processed 17 for sale; 18 (5) cooperation with the Alaska Seafood Marketing Institute and other public 19 or private boards, organizations, or agencies engaged in work or activities similar to the work 20 of the organization, including entering into contracts for joint programs of consumer 21 education, sales promotion, quality control, advertising, and research in the production, 22 processing, or distribution of seafood harvested in the region; 23 (6) cooperation with commercial fishermen, fishermen's organizations, 24 seafood processors, the Alaska Fisheries Development Foundation, the Fishery Industrial 25 Technology Center, state and federal agencies, and other relevant persons and entities to 26 investigate market reception to new seafood product forms and to develop commodity 27 standards and future markets for seafood products. 28 (c) An amount equal to the dive fishery management assessment collected under 29 AS 43.76.150 - 43.76.210 during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to be 30 $300,000 and deposited in the general fund, is appropriated from the general fund to the 31 Department of Fish and Game for payment in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, to the 01 qualified regional dive fishery development association in the administrative area where the 02 assessment was collected. 03 (d) The amount necessary to refund to local governments and other entities their share 04 of taxes and fees collected in the listed fiscal years under the following programs is 05 appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Revenue for payment to local 06 governments and other entities in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027: 07 FISCAL YEAR ESTIMATED 08 REVENUE SOURCE COLLECTED AMOUNT 09 Fisheries business tax (AS 43.75) 2026 $20,903,000 10 Fishery resource landing tax (AS 43.77) 2026 5,014,000 11 Electric and telephone cooperative tax 2027 4,408,000 12 (AS 10.25.570) 13 Liquor license fee (AS 04.11) 2027 785,000 14 Cost recovery fisheries (AS 16.10.455) 2027 0 15 (e) The amount necessary to refund to local governments the full amount of an 16 aviation fuel tax or surcharge collected under AS 43.40 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 17 2027, estimated to be $175,000, is appropriated from the proceeds of the aviation fuel tax or 18 surcharge levied under AS 43.40 to the Department of Revenue for that purpose. 19 (f) The amount necessary to pay the first seven ports of call their share of the tax 20 collected under AS 43.52.220 in calendar year 2026, according to AS 43.52.230(b), estimated 21 to be $31,014,000, is appropriated from the commercial vessel passenger tax account 22 (AS 43.52.230(a)) to the Department of Revenue for payment to the ports of call for the fiscal 23 year ending June 30, 2027. 24 (g) If the amount in the commercial vessel passenger tax account (AS 43.52.230(a)) 25 that is derived from the tax collected under AS 43.52.220 in calendar year 2026 is less than 26 the amount necessary to pay the first seven ports of call their share of the tax collected under 27 AS 43.52.220 in calendar year 2026, according to AS 43.52.230(b), the appropriation made in 28 (f) of this section shall be reduced in proportion to the amount of the shortfall. 29 * Sec. 30. RATIFICATION OF SMALL AMOUNTS IN STATE ACCOUNTING. The 30 appropriation to each department under this Act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, is 31 reduced to reverse negative account balances in amounts of $1,000 or less for the department 01 in the state accounting system for each prior fiscal year in which a negative account balance 02 of $1,000 or less exists. 03 * Sec. 31. CONSTITUTIONAL BUDGET RESERVE FUND. (a) Deposits in the budget 04 reserve fund (art. IX, sec. 17, Constitution of the State of Alaska) for fiscal year 2026 that are 05 made from subfunds and accounts of the operating general fund by operation of art. IX, sec. 06 sec. 17(d), Constitution of the State of Alaska, to repay appropriations from the budget 07 reserve fund are appropriated from the budget reserve fund to the subfunds and accounts from 08 which those funds were transferred. 09 (b) If the unrestricted state revenue available for appropriation in the fiscal year 10 ending June 30, 2027, is insufficient to cover the general fund appropriations made for the 11 fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the amount necessary to balance revenue and general fund 12 appropriations or to prevent a cash deficiency in the general fund is appropriated to the 13 general fund from the budget reserve fund (art. IX, sec. 17, Constitution of the State of 14 Alaska). 15 (c) The appropriations made in (a) and (b) of this section are made under art. IX, sec. 16 17(c), Constitution of the State of Alaska. 17 * Sec. 32. SUPPLEMENTAL CONSTITUTIONAL BUDGET RESERVE FUND. (a) If the 18 unrestricted state revenue available for appropriation in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, 19 is insufficient to cover the general fund appropriations made for the fiscal year ending 20 June 30, 2026, the amount necessary to balance revenue and general fund appropriations or to 21 prevent a cash deficiency in the general fund, not exceed $250,000,000, is appropriated to the 22 general fund from the budget reserve fund (art. IX, sec. 17, Constitution of the State of 23 Alaska). 24 (b) The sum of $129,598,900 is appropriated from the budget reserve fund (art. IX, 25 sec. 17, Constitution of the State of Alaska) to the Alaska higher education investment fund 26 (AS 37.14.750). 27 (c) The appropriations made in (a) and (b) of this section are made under art. IX, sec. 28 17(c), Constitution of the State of Alaska. 29 * Sec. 33. LAPSE OF APPROPRIATIONS. The appropriations made in secs. 8(a), (b) 30 (c)(1), (d), and (e), 10(c) - (e), 23(b), (c), and (i), 25, 26(a) - (j) and (l), 27(a) and (b), and 31 32(b) of this Act are for the capitalization of funds and do not lapse. 01 * Sec. 34. RETROACTIVITY. The appropriations made in sec. 1 of this Act that 02 appropriate either the unexpended and unobligated balance of specific fiscal year 2026 03 program receipts or the unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of a specified 04 account are retroactive to June 30, 2026, solely for the purpose of carrying forward a prior 05 fiscal year balance. 06 * Sec. 35. Section 34 of this Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). 07 * Sec. 36. Sections 20(b), 25(d), 26(c) and (d), and 32 of this Act take effect June 30, 2026. 08 * Sec. 37. Except as provided in secs. 35 and 36 of this Act, this Act takes effect July 1, 09 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.